Awww...I was hoping this post was about the living planet.
I think PoP slightly fixed the Vita-Chamber problem. When you are fighting an enemy if you "die", when elika brings you back your enemies regain a good chunk of health as well. Makes sense, right? Also when you fail at platforming there is also a punishment, the chance to stop an enemy from spawning. If you finish a puzzle fast enough you can kill an enemy before it spawns, however if you "die" in the middle of a platforming puzzle then you loose the precious time for stopping an enemy spawn. I'm not saying PoP is perfect but its a very good step towards solving the problem.
**Nigger + Obama. Jailbait + bestof** etc etc
The Universe In Motion - exactly what it says it is. The Earth, the stars, galaxies etc are all in motion. Do I win?
You should join the barefoot running community. We need more numbers and support. Instead all I get is "where the fuck are your shoes" from cops, friends, and especially strangers.
&gt;I've seen a seven year-old eat a condom on a dare  And it wasn't you or your sister?  Assuming it was another kid in your neighborhood, I'd be wondering if there was something in the water supply there, or high-tension power lines or something.  Maybe radon.
I would respond to you, but:  * You think you're better than me, which makes you a pompous little twat  * You're insulting me, when this thread has been completely civil  * You're a _stereotypical_ Microsoft hater. Seriously. _Stereotypical_.  So ya know what?  You can go choke a cock.   When you're able to have a discussion without sounding like a second grader, _feel free to reply_.
Be sure to get back to us when you have decided. Yawn.
Cool, they got flac though? That is kinda the thing that I need. I do like the cowon though. UI is a bit of a bitch to get used to but it is a nice little player.
This is idiotic. The kid is clearly not in any danger. What is he shielding the soldiers from exactly?
Wait, I see some raw flesh there... surely that's not... a _zombie_ nazi dinosaur?
[It had to happen...](http://i549.photobucket.com/albums/ii395/pastanoose/beareuro.png)
&gt; soullow, hooker chemical sent the game to the reader study for philosophy, with the third level that the show meant havoc features choosing from the campus of remains, and changing all prominent music. Soullow, connie is affiliated to put discover his receptacle to the football, and the two idea for each many.   Obviously.  [(Reference. 1st result for "soullow" on google)](http://freewebs.com/johnnewyear/soullow.html)
Nothing.  "Democracy" is just a thin justification for corrupt influence in the use of violence against people.  Whoever pays the most money gets to point the State guns onto its pet target.  You know what the worst part is?  That after several hundred years, every time The People get The Boot in Their Teeth, they lick their wounds, regroup, and ... what do they do?  Go BACK to the voting booth, repeat the same mistakes they did four years ago, and once more legitimize the violence their rulers exert on them.  (I can already smell the sweet sweet stench of conformism downvoting.)  If your hypothesis (*this time change*) does not match the results (*kick in the teeth*), why the fuck are you repeating the experiment?  Are rocks going to fall upwards next time?  Here's what's going to bring change around: a critical mass of people NOT PAYING TAXES simultaneously, and using that money to provide services to themselves in an autonomous manner.  And, of course, them not caving in when government makes either vacuous promises or exerts violence on them.  Freedom lies in self-sufficiency and self-determination.  Government neither affords the first, nor lets you exercise the second.
By people getting tired, you mean reddit, right?  Because it sure as hell seems to still work here in the United States. There is even an infomercial now running on Christian TV where some Jewish resettlement group is raising funds from evangelicals to pay money to get Jews relocated from dangerous areas.  They use this cynical tactic because it works.  Unfortunately.  US evangelicals and their supporters, not the sharpest tools in the shed.  At any rate, I always like to bring up Jonathan Pollard in such conversations.  It is truly a satisfying pasttime to derail any "discussion" of these issues by pointing out the fact that both sides are horrible, horrible hypocrites.
Since it's pedantic thread, it's not a Venn diagram.  And if it wasn't pedantic thread, I just made it so.
But watching all your windows repaint, and appear in various forms of ready (some parts splotches of colors, some parts whatever was the window on the other workspace in it's position) after switching workspaces is beauty?
Nope, not a troll.
that's why we have editors.
Dude it's totally me, Joe Rogan! You wanna eat a pot lollipop and put on our Jiu Jitsu gis and roll for a while? 
Huh, I stand corrected.  Nonetheless, there was still more punctuation than I'm used to seeing in a story such as this, I found all the 'interruptions' (commas, hyphens, brackets) quite jarring.
Heheh. "Pretending." &gt;_&gt;
prize to be renamed don't make the mistake of giving him a multi-million dollar contract award
you win some you lose zune...
You're adding things to my post that quite simply are not there. You are in fact preaching atheism, you don't need religion to preach something. You probably ought to reference a dictionary more often. You don't seem to know the meaning of a number of words you seem to like to use, two of which being atheism and preaching.  I never hinted that you weren't welcome to post here, but you come in here, you get confrontational and than you act all surprised that people aren't happy to see your posts? If you're really just here to troll why not come out with it? People come here to discuss Christianity, not to answer every atheist yokel with a chip on their shoulder.  Weren't you just complaining about: &gt;they seek more often to intimidate their opponent by expressing shock, outrage and disgust at a contrary opinion...and resultant disapproval of the doubters character  Yet now you so quickly jump right into that? Hypocritical much?  &gt;This is pure gold! You have to be a religiously afflicted, small minded, halfwit...to say something like that and expect to be taken seriously. New years advice: Grow up, and realize how absolutely weak your inspired rantings really are. Oh, and pray to your magic friend in the sky to smite me hip and thigh. How sad!  You want everyone to be polite and supporting to you and your views yet you are hostile to so many and their opinions.
Thank you for your unbiased, even-handed, fair assessment of the situation sir.
Actually, you are a fanboy...
**This is fake. Please read before downvoting.**  How about we actually research this guys? You'll notice in the top left corner something is blurred out. [Google "The day Israel used a boy aged 13 as a human shield"](http://www.google.com/search?q=The+day+Israel+used+a+boy+aged+13+as+a+human+shield) and you can browse through the other sites where the top left corner is NOT blurred out. Take [this one](http://www.zionismwatch.com//images/rsgallery/original/humanshield1.jpg), for example. You'll notice it says "Daily Mail, Friday, April 23, 2004". Hmm, I wonder why this would be blurred out? Possibly because _this article was never published_.  Head over to DailyMail.co.uk. Search the [same query](http://www.dailymail.co.uk/home/search.html?searchPhrase=The+day+Israel+used+a+boy+aged+13+as+a+human+shield) as before. You'll notice it says 'No results found'. **This is fake**.  Alternatively, google the small text ("THIS is what happened to a Palestinian child who joined teenagers throwing stones at Israeli border police. ")
Not a fan :(
go back to Digg
Correct.  The love of *a particular individual* may not be for sale, but you can bet your ass that a sizable portion of the whole universe of individuals is gonna löööve their sugar daddies.
Well America is Israel's bitch.  Israel is basically saying "Is a nigga gonna have to slap a bitch?"
Why shouldn't they retain power? Why would they need a pretext? They won the elections fair and square, did they not?
[Here](http://socserv2.mcmaster.ca/~econ/ugcm/3ll3/veblen/margutil.txt). The Marginal Utility theory is not scientific.  Furthermore *actual* a priori truths are necessarily true on all conceivable worlds. For example, 2 + 2 MUST = 4; It is actually impossible to imagine a different outcome.  I'm sorry that you feel that I have engaged in rhetoric - I would think that the fact that I openly admitted that I did not understand the thrust of your final argument from your previous post demonstrated that this was not my intent.
Hahaha what a stupid kid
awww...  ...  having said that, now get him inside.
I agree with Visual Studio - it's fantastic tool. But the new Office has been overhyped and not lived up to the expectations. I'd say it added little useful and was a huge step backwards in terms of usability. Let Office team die too.  As for Vista. yes it was shit, but I think it's going to be like New Coke. When Windows 7 comes out everyone will love it, because it will just undo some of the stuff in Vista. Maybe that was the plan all along. If so, they did a damn good job.
Taft for president! 
I agree, but are you doing for tonight?
I,I,I....Oh hell, fuck you!
It's been three years.
I know my last comment was long, but this wont be so long. I just had a great idea. Fallout 4 (If it is to come out) Should be During and after the war! Your in whatever state they choose, then you find out the war is going on, the you have a little while to find cover. Your decision for place of cover will affect if your a ghoul or not. But the start of the game should be in your state, you wake up having had a dream/vision of the war to come. You go around earning money for a place to buy whether it be doing jobs, or thievery, maybe get some people to believe your psychotic rants, and they will follow you into cover. The outcome will result in a post-apocalyptic settlement. Then you can play as your descendants and maybe down there in time, get to consult with the Vault Dweller. Reply and remember, some montages may come up soon!
The problem with guns is that most people aren't trained to go around killing/maiming people. That's what a gun is for. You take your average mild-mannered Jane Nobody, give her a gun, put her in a dangerous situation, and she'll hesitate. She doesn't want to hurt someone.  That's the problem. If someone tries to hurt you, you go after them with everything you've got. No mercy. You let up until they're either unconscious or dead. Not before.  Oh well. It's a good thing stuff like this is rather unlikely to happen to most people.
More information needed:  how drunk?  If it's just a couple of beers and you're salivating at the prospect of judging her, I'm gonna have some concerns.
Morals shouldn't ever come into lawmaking imo (although I'm sure people will reply with about a kajillion cases where they are important). It's a case of victims. Who is the victim if someone sits at hope watching tentacle rape? Who is the victim if someone is taking drugs?  I couldn't care less if my next door neighbours have freaky furry sex each night. Or if they get turned on by simpsons porn. It's their personal life and it's none of my business.
What turn you off Zot?
There's not much point commenting. All the good puns have been hit.
I tried it once when I was 20, but I didn't have the proper utensil to smoke it with and couldn't get a solid dose. It took me ten more years to find it again, and boy was it worth the wait. All the amazing tales are true.
you can do a lot with a free F18.
halp!  i not hotdawg!
99.9% of the human population is motivated by self interest, and those who aren't don't last long in *any* career.  Science probably has a somewhat greater percentage of idealistic types than most fields, but not enough to change the dynamics of greed, protectiveness, and self interest that control it.  This is not news.  And certainly not worthy of a dedicated tirade blog, imo.  
&gt;and lots of people who actually like her.  Like *her*? Or like her policies?   Because I kinda like GWB as a person. I figure he'd be a great friend to have. Box seats at Cowboys games, private jet to travel around, always have a gopher handy (Hey, Secret Service guy - fetch me a beer!)
I guess that means we can torture John Bolton, then. 
Godwin's law is kicking in awfully early in this thread...
Yes, you can probably hurt their production capability for a while, but for how long? Or, are you going to bomb and blockade a population of 1,5 million back to stoneage permanently?  The basic infrastructure they need to launch those rockets are hate. By your current actions you are only brewing more hate. There are now small boys morning their big brothers that where killed as they where working in the Hamas police force. There are kids hiding in shelters while they listen to the Apache helicopters waiting for the Helfire missile. In 10 years these small kids will be in the position to revenge what they experienced tonight. Your actions to night are strengthening the extremist.   You are the strong side and must take responsibility to break this cycle of violence and hate. There are no other option that are acceptable. Offer a solution that they majority of the Palestinians can accept, and the extremist will have little to counter this with.   But be prepared that this solution probably  will mean that you will need to give up stuff that you will find painful. That is what compromise is, not dictating terms from a position of strength.  EDIT: By the way, happy new year!
DO I!?!
If she is seriously 7 years old, arrest the parents/guardians.  EDIT: looks like children's services got involved according to -scout.
Take benzodiazepines like Xanax, Valium, or Alepam when coming down from MDMA.  It curbs the crash and helps bring your brain back down to baseline so you're not tempted to keep popping more E.  EDIT: Oh, and make sure you have a balanced meal before your trip.  If you're going to be dancing a lot, put electrolytes in your water bottle so you don't suffer from hyponatremia.  Heed is a good brand that you can find at most health stores and groceries.
"Furthermore, while I have a Ph.D. in economics, it was not earned in a program that garners the academic respect of a Harvard or Stanford doctorate.  Supposedly, that means I cannot criticize anything that the “high-level” economists say."  Translation: BAWWWWWWWWWWWW
This just goes to show anyone will say anything on the internet.  Could you imagine making that call to a pizza place over the phone?  Not many people would do that.
I don't think any amount of psuedo science can predict a persons future behaviors.  I think any one can hide behind a mask to get what they want.  I mean your asking these "professionals" to predict a persons behavior, why not just call a psychic? 
Before I was born in this body maybe.  Maybe I travelled back in time for a bit?  Maybe I'm just projecting myself forward now?  If I inspired the Bible back then and am talking to you now, isn't that evidence that I've got some super awesome powers?
I had a hooker say that to me once.  And she wasn't lying.
WAKE UP, SHEEPLE
i suppose if i spent my time worrying about what other people thought of me then you'd be correct.  i do agree with you that some people come across as stupid based upon their mis(use) of written language. and most of those people probly _are_ stupid.
They should call me Mario. Because I just got 1-Uped
Poor Megaton will never be the same.
Yes, I know that prices being set by sellers who are guided by costs of production *does* unsettle many Austrians.  In all honesty, I think it may be a small over-reaction to the objective value ideas believed by Marx and some of the classicals before him (whose labor theory of value appeared to lay the groundwork to Marx's exploitation theory).  While supply and demand are the *ultimate* determinants of price, the fact the producers of manufactured goods follow profits forces me to accept that costs are more of a determinant in prices than most people realize. For example, it is tempting to say that the price of a GM car is determined solely by the supply and demand for GM cars.  In this respect, one is led to think that the final buyers solely determine the price by their subjective valuations.  But this ignores the role of the producer.  Producers will simply not produce GM cars priced at $10,000 say, if it means they have to suffer losses.  The consumer could theoretically want to pay no more than $10,000 for the GM car, and any price above that they will not pay.  But I always try to remain in the Aristotelian framework that says the only reality is that which exists and is real.  A consumer who wants to pay no more than $10,000 doesn't mean the price for GM cars is $10,000. In order for a price to be a price, money has to actually change hands.  GM producers will not be willing to accept $10,000 per car if it means they have to suffer losses, or earn below market profits.  Therefore, even though the consumers *want* to pay $10,000 each for a certain supply of cars, they will end up not being able to buy any GM car at all.  Since no GM cars are being produced, there are no prices.  Since there are no prices, it means the consumer really isn't the direct determinant of what the price is.  If they were, then GM producers would have to produce cars at a loss, which is impossible.  Therefore, the only way GM cars can be produced, such that a price for GM cars actually exists, is if the price set by the sellers of GM cars is *at least as big as the costs, plus the going rate of profit*.  Since the rate of profit *tends* to be the same for car manufacturing (in a free market, without tariffs, subsidies, etc), it must mean that the costs of producing cars is the *proximate* determinant of price.  The Reisman article you linked to, and the authors cited therein, especially Bohm-Bawerk, in all honesty pretty much sums up my sources for costs of production.  You are absolutely right that many Austrians are wary of getting into the cost of production framework.  Again, my best guess for why is that they don't want to give any credibility at all to objective value, because the whole Austrian theory is based on subjective valuation, and so a path towards objective value seems to be a return to the exploitation framework.  If I could add to your comment regarding hours in the day, I think to myself that I can have a longer life if I study history.  History of ideas, events, economic thought, etc.  It makes me feel like I have lived a long life.  I think education is the path to immortality.  Oh, I just remembered, there is an interesting story about objective value (costs of production), and subjective value (marginal utility):  Mises and Ayn Rand, during a social gathering, were arguing over whether value was objective or subjective.  Others present at the gathering were amazed at how intense the conversation became, with Mises stressing subjectivity, and Rand stressing objectivity.  I will try to find a reference for you.
They're be grammar nazi's on my Internets.
I'm aware of alternate, looser expressions :)
Wow, even before I heard of this, I noticed my Zune was stuck at the loading screen. I'm leaving it like that so I can show people the Z2K9 epidemic.
Watch this first:  http://www.tinyurl.com/occupation101
Millions?! Are you fucking kidding me?  Try Billions in dollars each year are given to Israel "carte blanche"  No stipulations about no more settlements, no strings attached about not spying on the US, or anything - just here ya go, be sure to commit genocide against the Arabs, and incite the entire world to loathe us. Fuckers.
&gt;It's like me beating up the little kid down the block. Satisfying?
Dude... his comments define trolling.
Or you can drive out one night to see it. 
YO DAWG I HERD YOU LIKE CUBES SO WE PUT A CUBE IN YO CUBE SO YOU CAN LIKE WHILE YOU LIKE
It always struck me as funny how, when the Allied powers felt guilty over the Holocaust they decided to give the Jews their own nation. But they didn't feel guilty enough to give them any land in the USA, England or France. Instead, they gave them the Arabs' land.  That worked out great.  I think Israel would do fine in southern Utah/northern Arizona. We could tie it to the Native American reservation system. They could use $3 billion a year.
No, in Bulgaria they get the happy ending but no Big Mac.
Well, he is black.  Was it her first day on the job, or did she really think that she was going to get a tip?  It is like trying to squeeze blood from a turnip
Oh yeah... woops.
Gonzalez is fishing for the wrong kinds of jobs.  If I were Alberto Gonzalez, I'd hire myself out as a professional "smugmeister."  Basically political entities, upon winning or gaining the upper hand with their enemies, could hire Gonzalez out to stand on high towers and the like looking smugly at the losing side.  Or press conferences.  This could be lucrative.  Say I'm Taliban and just won some major assault against the "government" of Afghanistan.  I'd probably make a video or have a press conference.  I'd give a ranting speech, and then just have Alberto come and stare into the camera with his default facial expression, which is pure, unadulterated smugness.  Smugness For Hire.  Yeah.
Keep telling yourself that if it props of the illusion of hope. Obama is just as part of the system as Bush. He is merely a different brand-name, 'Change'. And you all ate that shit up. If you were in any way shape or form not a complete tool you would have at least heard what noam chomsky has said about Obama: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tEJyrrgUvFI
Maybe all the presidents are on vacation?
Droste Effect. Google it.
Needs more butter.  
Capital is a relation between people.  It is a relation maintained through force, exercised by the police.  Do you deny that the majority of people in prison are there for property crimes?
&gt; Anytime you install a command, Ubiquity asks you "Seriously, do you know what you're doing? This could completely screw you over, you know that, right? Right?!"  Man, I wish real life had that feature. Would have saved me a lot of trouble.
I don't know. I had two iRiver players before I got my Zune. I *really* liked them - found them easy to work with, and of course syncing them was easy.  Another thing I like about the iRiver players is that some of the models take a AAA battery, so throw a couple of those in your bag and you're never without a player. 
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tyrannosaurus_Reich
Well, say if you want to write a scalable, fault tolerant web services application.  You can implement the web facing, connection holding, front end grunt work to Erlang and OTP. Erlang is pretty good at that sort of thing. You can implement the complex backend work in haskell. With this package, the erlang nodes will be able to communicate with haskell nodes pretty seamlessly.  Best of both worlds.
talk to Wittgenstein: http://press.princeton.edu/titles/7747.html
Happens in Chicago.  shit, the thugs went nuts with their guns when Obama won the presidency.  and when the White Sox won the world series?  i happened to be at band practice on the west side and the shit was off the chain.
I'm for people period. When they put away their religons, politics and philosophies and break some bread with a decent table wine. But if they want to tell me their religons and beliefs make them "chosen people" they can kiss my ass.
I don't have a family.  I don't know how babby is formed.  Can you tell me?
it's called PR. 
That is all, but feel free to say your resolutions if you want. I have none.
We've always known they were a bunch of assholes.
The zune issue [only requires a reboot](http://www.zune.net/en-us/support/zune30.htm), where the nano required a battery replacement, ergo the battery issues were not minor by comparison.
How about a blog about how someone did their civic duty and served jury duty. 
'for the war on terror' plastered all over the embedded article.   meaning you could probably only really use one in iraq or afghanistan. 
M1A Scout  Mini-14  Winchester 70 in .270 Winchester w/ Leupold VXII 2-7x33  Winchester 94 in .44 Mag w/ 20" barrel  Mossberg 590a1  Benelli Nova 12-ga  Kimber Pro-carry .45  Beretta 92  Ruger SRH Alaskan .454  Ruger SBH .44  Glock 21SF .45  ...and a sturdy safe, of course, cuz you can't always be around to give house-robbin' motherfuckers their reward  ...and reloading equipment, of course, cuz you never know what those morons in Washington will think of next  Californian, but from Texas, if that helps things make sense  Libertarian, voted for Obama
My wife and I [traveled around the world](http://spothopping.com/about) recently, and I was asked how we afforded it. [Here's what I wrote](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/7igry/welcome_mike_aka_raldi_to_team_reddit/c06qx9t):  ----  Traveling is only as expensive as you make it.   Hilary and I saved up for most of our late 20s, living in a 400-square-foot apartment and, significantly, having a tiny City Hall wedding instead of a giant extravaganza. This allowed us to splurge here and there (renting cars, staying in hotels with air conditioning, visiting first-world countries)  However, even if you only have, say, $5000 -- which you will if you skip the big wedding -- you can still do some really fantastic and life-changing travel. For example, flights from New York to Bangkok are currently around $1300 round-trip. Alternately, you can get to Kunming, China for $1100.. or India for $900. Once you get there, the other $3700+ will last months. And, of course, once you get to the other side of the world, you can take short, cheap, local flights; Chiang Mai to Luang Prabang is just $129, and the cultures are like night and day. Train rides within a country cost even less.  If you go with a buddy, or better yet, a significant other, costs will drop by almost half, since you'll be sharing rental cars, rooms, books, hired guides, etc. Really everything except food and admission.  The real extravagant cost of a trip like this is time: You simply can't do it without quitting your job.  I think that, as people start getting married and having babies later and later in life, it's going to be fairly normal to leave one's job and travel for a few months as part of that transition. Especially if you're already moving to another city anyway.  And don't worry, you can always get another job. Even in this economy.  And you know what? Even if I hadn't been able to, even if it had taken me a year to find work, I wouldn't have regretted a thing. Not for a second.
I'd even call shenanigans.
*cringe*
Art, Divorce, Quantum Physics, Poetry, Music, the Written Word, probably other things. 
More effective than Hamas' "human shields." They just get blown up.
This sort of thing always reminds me of when a founding father (Jefferson I believe) said he couldn't find anywhere in the Constitution where it granted him the right to take money from Americans to send to any other country for any reason. Now we think nothing of doing all the time, even when we are up to our ears in debt. We really need an amendment to the Constitution making this illegal anytime the budget isn't balanced.
ICU814MI?
My legs are like the exact opposite. In fact, I think his calves are bigger than my quads.
my cell phone calendar is refusing to accept dates in 2009.... it worked just the other day though.........
[No.](http://www.weather.com/weather/local/USNY0996?from=enhsearch_reg)
I can't stop clicking on it.
Someone explain why we should be paying any of these thug states? What is the up side for America? Perhaps if there was less money they would just be throwing rocks and hitting each other with sticks. I say leave them to their own games.
Double clicking on icons in quick launch just doesn't stop, no matter what.
I am a man.  I think buying diamonds is stupid.  Ergo, you should have sex with me
I NAMED MINE TITTIES LOLZ
Hence why he said a *120*lb man.
i believe its sql like a pig
or in a public restroom
Unfortunately, many men get pretty strong clues from women that if they *don't* spend money on diamonds, they won't get to procreate at all. There just aren't enough diamond-haters to go around.
Great Big Sea!  Newfoundland Folk-Rock galore :)  Their live albums are excellent.
Ha Ha! "Brewer's Droop".
I've hiked 20 miles at twenty below (-29C); you just need the appropriate clothing. Seriously.  Mind you, not saying that it's smart to let a kid go without supervision in good weather, let alone such bad temperatures.
http://i39.tinypic.com/l8cub.jpg  Nothing finer.   "Reach out! Reach out and touch someone."
god....it's like talking to a 9/11 truther
There's other things I don't like about the city.  Unfriendly people, crime, few trees, rain that smells like pollutants...  I'd rather get away from this place.  And it's not even a particularly big city.  I can't believe how it must be to live in New York.
And [this is why](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/7m9u9/what_is_something_you_do_that_you_wouldnt_want/6p99) I keep considering a name change :).
A begrudging up vote to waronyou.  Great videos.
What I wonder - as a non-programmer - is how the date has anything to do with it playing music? Why would a simple function such as date bring it to it's knees? Probably DRM....fuckers.
My favorite part:   &gt;After we ate most of it I saw on the box that my satisfaction was "guaranteed," and that if I wasn't completely satisfied -- they would "make it right" or refund my money.  &gt;Unfortunately it was too late for me to call and request that someone come back to my house to rotate the pizzas and re-position my beef pellets.
Thats racist of you to point that out. 
When the end comes, it will look like [this](http://animals.nationalgeographic.com/staticfiles/NGS/Shared/StaticFiles/animals/images/primary/przewalskis-horse.jpg).  Plus thousands of employees hoofing it.
&gt;Yes it is a form of DRM, but it isn't shitty  That's like saying "Yes herpes is an STD, but it won't kill you".
Affordable,unique handcrafted jewelry in copper, silver and polymer clay. Pendants, necklaces,earrings and bracelets.
That is fantastic.
My parents are deaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaad.
Personally, I care about dead Iraqis and Palestinians because my money is funding the killers.  There are far too many people in the world to care about them all individually, but when my money is taken from me and used to kill people instead of doing something useful, I get pissed off.  I don't actually care about people outside of my monkey-sphere, but I don't want to be associated with killing people that don't deserve to die.
SPAM
I've never had a bad experience with the police, nor have I ever met anyone who has.  I find the stories on reddit quite funny. They usually are titled something like "Young Man Shot 3 Times and Dog Killed for Standing in Front Yard." Not sensationalist at all.
I've just upgraded my long dark night of the soul to a full blown existential meltdown.  You?
Yes,absolutely.
First, the "^H" stuff - you're doing it wrong. Second, any perceived difference between "capitalists" and "working-class people" is entirely imagined.  There's absolutely nothing stopping you or anybody else from starting up a business and becoming an entrepreneur.  Creating a corporation or LLC takes a couple hundred dollars and a few hours filling out paperwork.  A sole proprietership is even easier.
I'd totally buy that -- sparkles even nicer than diamonds, and I'm all for sparkle. Convincing a girl that it isn't a "fake" diamond may be a bit tough.
I want to see these soldiers carrying the injured into hospitals... the dead into morgues. Hell, Hitler could stroke a cat.
IAmPerfectlyCalm comments all the time.  I think he/she is just an aww junkie.
Yeah I tried drinking while watching the beginning... that would not have ended well, had I gotten the bottle to my mouth.
[Nathan Phillips Square](http://www.toronto.ca/special_events/cavalcade_lights/newyearseve.htm)?
Seems about right. It's a 5 topping pizza. They rape you on the per-topping price. Never order a custom pizza. Order a different pizza and then substitute the toppings. Eg, get a Meat lovers has Pepperoni, Ham, Beef topping, Italian Sausage, Bacon and is $16.49 for a large. He wanted Pepperoni and Bacon, so sub the Ham, Beef, and Sausage for Mushrooms, Jalapeños, and Black Olives. Of course, you have to do this over the phone, cause the online form won't allow it.
hasslatte
There's another one as well - it's called a "Credit Card".
Memories of feeling spoiled by digital tuning, MegaBass, and Auto-Reverse.
*One* moral to the story is "the world is fucked up and it shouldn't be like this," but the other is "in a fucked up world, watch your own back and be careful when dealing with psychos."
My sister got pregnant at 15 and the whole church shunned us.  I remember thinking how fucked up that was that the week before they found out everyone was so nice to us and then...nothing.   I lost my faith in catechism class at 12.  I think its funny I lost my faith while actively in a church with church people talking, I realized it was bullshit.  My parents still don't know.  I have not come out of the "closet" to them. 
Yeah, but her husband would be pissed.
Like you know anything.
Hardly.
Every state with borders and immigration laws is a form of nationalism. Look at what is happening in Europe right now: it is flooded with immigrants from eastern countries (and I am not saying this to belittle these immigrants). People in the modern world migrate easily to where they think they will get better chance. Even if we assume for a moment that arabs in general wish us no ill will, uncontrolled arab immigration would quickly, if not instantly, turn Israel into yet another arab state; and then things would get much worse because that'd revive the aspirations of regional empires. Egypt would want to expand Sinai; Jordan will want water; Syria will want the Golan heights; and soon, the national jewish home will disintegrate and jews will become homeless again.
&gt; Capital is a relation between people.  [No](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Capital_(economics\)).  Capital is readily investable wealth.  It is composed of objects or debt.  But it is definitely NOT a relation.  I'd appreciate if you could use concepts rigorously, instead of trying to pass loose metaphors for fact.  This is the third time in our conversation that you have tried to mix symbols for the things they may (or may not) represent.  &gt; maintained through force, exercised by the police.  The police is not the only agent of force that may defend against robbery -- you or a private security force may too.  And there is nothing wrong with using force to defend private property.  I do agree that the police are immoral, but not for the reason stated above; rather, it is because the police puts you in jail if you do not give your pound of flesh to the government.  So, as you can see, it is *people in government* who rob you and jail you, not "capital".   &gt; Do you deny that the majority of people in prison are there for property crimes?  No.  But who puts them in prison?  "Capitalism" or *government agents*?  And please don't try and say "but the police and the government are in service of capitalism!".  Police exist in communist, totalitarian, feudal and monarchic regimes just as well as they exist in capitalism, so capitalism ISN'T the source of the violence that police use.
I was under the impression that Mars is part of the milky way so by definition it can not be brighter than the milky way.
It's very sad. All the animals were so scared and upset. It was like a kaleidoscope of suffering. 
Ah, propaganda.  It's funny that Israel is taking so much crap for ACCIDENTALLY killing civilians while Hamas takes none for TARGETING civilians.  It's almost as if the redditors interested in this subject are complete fucking morons. Wait... no... it is not almost, is it?
[here](http://www.kongregate.com/games/ArmorGames/achievement-unlocked)
all through november and most of December i lobbied my friends to go up to Milwaukee to go to the NYE Cake show (www.cakemusic.com), but no one wanted to go.  i should have fucking gone by myself.  i'll be at my friends condo with about 10 or 15 other people.  right now there are two plans...1) play Rock Band and 2) get lusciously sloshed.  who knows what else may come up.
I never said it justified infant circumcision.  It's simply an explanation.  Jeez, stop trying to turn me into the bad guy!  As I've already said:  &gt;I agree that it's not right to force a kid into it  &gt;Getting rid of perfectly healthy tissue when it's medically unnecessary is ALWAYS bad  And please don't insult me by comparing cutting off a small piece of foreskin to excising entire essential organ systems.
As much as I would love to see Obama come out and take a stance on this, it really would just result in chaos and be a complete mess.
From what I've read it looks like the DRM is pretty well integrated into the device and probably loads at startup regardless of what files are loaded on it.  Disclaimer: I don't own and have no plans to own a Zune.
Every day is No Digg Day in this neighborhood.
... Guy posts asking why his parent is downmoded, someone complains about digg, etc etc etc...
flipping amazingsauce.
Yeah, who is interested in Internet Explorer? 
Prove it isn't with research, not attacks.  You are only supporting preconceived notions that similarly have no scientific basis. Crystal structures align energy, that is a fact.  How that energy manifests itself is worth looking into. It's how we developed lasers, by the way.  Here's an interesting link on SiO2, using science all around:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TdCmipeoGyg  As for Nazi UFOs, Hitler and Von Braun invested heavily into research on it from '39-'45.  Also, rumors swirl of an Antarctic base that held out until '47 when Admiral Byrd lead a huge armada there for an "exercise."  Besides, a strong enough EMF will levitate metallic objects, it's not that difficult.
Is sick sex as good as hate sex?
count how many times you said fuck.  Thats probably it.
Toilet Photoshop, anyone?
Perhaps try an actual title next time.
Needs to be location-aware. It's been 2009 for 10 minutes here in England, and it's saying no.
My parents still copy paste by right clicking &gt; Copy  &gt; right click &gt; Paste. 
Not all are "thugs," you stereotyping fool.
The profession of Policeman lots its honor back in the early 90's.
They disagree with the interpretation that the second amendment defends an *individual's* right to own a gun (as opposed to a well regulated militia).  http://www.aclu.org/crimjustice/gen/35904res20020304.html  Despite volunteering and donating to their organization I disagree with their stance on this issue. In any event they do a lot of good opposing atrocious things such as "free speech zones".  To be frank I think it's a little asinine to not support an organization because they do some good but don't defend every last thing you stand for. Do you refuse to donate to Children's Cancer Society because they don't help children with diabetes too? wtf
Yes, but it doesn't affect the normal operations of Reddit. It only comes into play in our cheating-detection code.
My fiance, playing Crysis, once muttered:  "I am stealthy as *shit*. You ever see shit move? No. Because it's *stealthy*."
Are you referring to the US gov't or the people?
Keep your pimp hand strong.
Venus. http://media.skyandtelescope.com/images/WebVic08Dec30.jpg
&gt; the problem is, when i give a definition for exist, and then say concepts dont exist, you use your own definition for what exist means and say 'yes concepts exist  No.  As I said, I used only your definition.  &gt;lets use your senses definition and money. lets burn the paper, show me the money.  You've destroyed the object upon which both the concepts of paper and money have been applied.  Of course the money won't be there anymore, neither will paper.  In that same sense, most objects don't exist.  A brick doesn't exist once I've destroyed it.  Again, leave any concept off my definition of exist out of this.  I'm operating entirely with your definition still.  How did I make a mistake in my definition of a point.  What is the flaw?  What is it you disagree with?  Stop bring up more concepts and topics... lets see if we can finish with just one.  -  Definition of Point: a location in a space.  What is wrong with that definition? Where are the conflicts?
Only during the term of the marriage.  A spouse can't dissolve and abscond with marital assets when planning a divorce.  Any money he took would be counted in a split, whether or not he spent or hid it.  It's quite common for spouses to make such assumptions, thinking they can hide/spend/waste assets before a divorce, but it's just not the case, and any competent divorce lawyer will get those assets counted. Google "dissipated assets."
&gt;Unlike C#, you almost never need to manually wire event handlers in VB.  It's not just about event handlers.  More and more it's about delegates.  You don't tend to do a lot with anon-delegates and lambdas in VB.NET because the implementation still sucks (you are limited to one-liners even with the new Function statement.)  This really sucks when you need to reduce a collection.  For example, you have a list of names and you need to get a smaller list with all names that start with "I."  In VB.NET, you're using a loop, and conditional statements, etc.  In C#, this is a one-liner.  With that said, WithEvents is awesome in VB.NET especially when you realize everything that it does (e.g. when you alter the variable, it unbinds the handlers from the old object, and then rebinds them to the new object.)  &gt;DirectCast is a different beast entirely, and not one I approve of. (I don't approve of C#'s casting syntax either, they both suck in my opinion.)  What would you like instead of DirectCast and the c# (type) syntax?
We might actually get the warning this time.
People indoctrinated by the corporate media (legitimate media according to the article) are less likely to believe in 911 conspiracy theories.  
Nothing good.
Clever girl.
I'm not sure I want to know what dolphins are saying about us, it can't be good. 
The grown up soldiers should know they should NOT kill innocent harmless kids.  BTW, never in Israel's history a soldier was punished for his/her war crime(s).
Did you even listen to the audio, it was obvious who was the loudmouth you brainless fanboi.
Once again you are twisting the meaning of this word.  Zionism is today and has always been a basically nationalistic political ideology.  I can support other Jews, their right to exist and survive and procreate and etc., without supporting a state that practices all kinds heinous acts on essentially religious grounds.  edit: whole-Israel supporters are simply the most extreme of the Zionists.  The point is that allowing the Palestinians to exist is the only possible solution and Zionism is totally incompatible with this.
Ads are a waste of money because most people hate them. I say take the idiots who actually click on those things, put them in a room where they click all day and spare the rest of the internet the trouble.
Now that takes ovaries!
Wow, that was an uncalled for rant you angry little person. Did I say I idolized the man?  Nope.  I didn't say it because I don't.  I hate basketball, but I do think it is funny that someone like Michael Jordan would be here when there are much better places to be haha.  I would be curious if I saw MJ in Backwater Alabama too.  Don't jump to conclusions...jeez.
That's a single topping. Order a large custom pizza with 5 toppings and tell me how much it costs.
That would be over 100 billion dollars.  Do they have the means to produce the fuel for them? Do they remember their Chernobyl? Do their neighbours remember?
As long as we're on the subject, what the hell is reverse-racism ? Isn't the definition of racism to discriminate against a person of another race. So why is it when someone points out a black person is racist, they say it's reverse-racism ?
Dude, that was great...bookmarked!
I believe its icon stared at me for a few years in my Windows 3.11 *for Workgroups* days. Is that possible? If so, I never opened it. Either way, you're right. Dodged that bullet.
I loathe rampant consumerism.  Now, where did I put all those gift cards I got for Christmas?  Oh yes, I put them under the Xbox 360 in the game room.
My niece got an animatronic cat for xmas.  It's a bit on the creepy side.
I get loaded with a 40.
I like the Israelis definition of fair - it means their people get to go home.  Funny, when civilians start throwing rockets around and call themselves a military force, why should the police get involved?  Send in the military.  Military force is used when diplomacy fails.  I would say Hamas failed.
I have mixed emotions about this.   On the one hand - it's pretty cheesy. I mean, it's the kind of thing I'd write as a joke.   On the other hand, trying to rush out a fix for something that may be substantially architectural in under 24 hours is really begging for trouble. So "wait until tomorrow" is really just recognition of the reality of software.   Interesting question is - if it was you, after tomorrow do you bother fixing it for 2012? I mean, either all the Zune30's will be dead anyway or we will be...
The cowon advertises 16 hours of battery life...and they are pretty spot on about that. I have easily gotten 12 out of the little bugger.
True :P
That don't watch Family Guy?
"extreme emotional distress, fright, nervousness, indignity, humiliation, insult, loss of relationship and comfort" I wish I could sue every time I was nervous!
&gt;We have no viable solutions because the waste is radioactive for hundreds of thousands of years...  It does not have to be. The long-lived isotopes are transuranics - actinide elements in the bottom row of the periodic table, past uranium. These are extremely heavy nuclei, and will fission; they can be **destroyed** in a nuclear reactor with fast neutrons ("fast reactor"). The remainder of the waste is short-lived fission products, which can decay to natural ore levels within two centuries.  This is very feasible:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Integral_Fast_Reactor  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nuclear_fuel_cycle#Minor_actinides_recycling  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Radioactive_waste#Transmutation  The point is that, when you destroy the actinides, what's left is either *reasonably* short-lived and can be easily stored, or long-lived enough that its radioactivity is negligibly low.   &gt;You also have a risk of nuclear explosions ie Chernobyl.  Chernobyl was not a nuclear explosion, it was a meltdown which resulted in a steam explosion (excessive heat caused steam to expand and rupture the pressure vessel). The energy involved was far less than a nuclear weapon: the disaster was more like a dirty bomb - the effects were from the explosive dispersion of very radioactive fission products. The power surge which caused the meltdown cannot occur in most kinds of nuclear reactors: it is basically a design flaw in the RBMK reactor, which is unstable in that way.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/RBMK#High_Positive_Void_Coefficient
I like to play the scientists' drinking game. You watch a sci-fi flick and drink every time they fuck something up. Double drinks for mysticism attached to quantum physics and for arguments about whether or not something was actually fucked up or is true.
We can dream.  As long as it still fits in a pocket, I'm cool with it.
Nine year old daughter: what's that screaming?  Ten year old son: "It's the song of the goat king."
Hope you have a good one. I burnt my thumb on a firework :(
&gt;It's simple enough for the music theory-inclined: vi-IV-I-V. No good? Well, for a song in the key of A minor, it would be Am-F-C-G.  Ummmm vi-IV-I-V in A- isn't that. Unless the vi of A- is A- :o
Don't forget  &gt; The turn of the Earth. The ground beneath our feet is spinning at a thousand miles an hour, and the entire planet is hurtling around the sun at sixty-seven thousand miles an hour, and I can feel it. We're falling through space, you and me. Clinging to the skin of this tiny little world, and if we let go... 
He forgot something: before becoming Stalin, the guy's name was Dzhugashvili and he was a petty bandit, a bank robber and a thief. Yagoda was a pedophile who enjoyed strangling little girls (if I remember correctly). And don't forget that the soviet machine has eventually destroyed all those who built it.  Oh wait I forgot, big noses. Never mind.
Fuck them both?
Unfortunately, the situation has now lasted long enough that the Israelis themselves now have some natural rights to live in the areas they have settled.  However the notion the Israelis seem to be pursuing - that making your neighbors hate you is a way to promote a happy neighborhood -  utterly baffles me.
I bitch online and post links to stories on reddit that warn people. 
I c wut u did thar
im worried that so many people search for dane cook getting married and barbara streisand
Nice answer but completely incorrect.  The correct answer is:  the limited liability corporation.
Three seconds in and his voice is pissing me off.
+1 internets for effort.
They keep saying they are minimizing civilian casualties. Hard to believe when we see the carnage of those mega bombs the US so generously donates.
No, because the money supply has to increase as more wealth is created.  It is just silly to confuse price inflation (which is inflation in the common usage) with money supply growth.  I wish people would stop doing that.
You scarred this tread by posting again.
The one thing I would disagree with is that people were more gullible in ancient times. Less knowledgable, yes. But I suspect that there was the same mix of sceptics, true-believers and people who'll hang around and enjoy the show. If a preacher had a message that fit the times particularly well, then I could easily imagine that a significant crowd would gather around him. That crowd would include a body of true-believers, who would delude themselves.  That is no different from the way people behave nowadays.
Aust.
It irritates me when people who aren't staff or security wear "STAFF" and "SECURITY" shirts, and a POLICE shirt could be misleading in the same way, especially in a crowd of drunken idiots. The cops were *more* in the wrong, but the victim here was poking tigers with sticks. No wonder he got bit.
rad
This. It only says that witnesses said he shouted something in a Middle Eastern language. 
no, he's article-phobic
No thank you. Not even if I was paid.
Ah, but you see, what he told the news reporter and what he posted in his blog are different. The most obvious lie is in what the pastor said while the man was in jail. In his blog post he says that the pastor pointed a finger and said that this was due to his abandonment of his faith. And in the news story: "The 42-year-old was eventually jailed, accused of molesting a 12-year-old.  He says while behind bars, the pastor of Heritage Baptist Church, Bob Barton, came to see him and told him to confess.  'If I confessed things would go more smoothly for me.  I was so broken, I would have jumped off a bridge if he told me,' said Silverman." So you see that blog post really was missing some details. I don't doubt now that most of it is true, but I now know for sure that it has been edited for maximum emotional impact on readers.
Volume.   Yes, your iPod is *already* "old"  It's the second generation.  And, yes, it does feel marvelous to hold.  Just like the iPhone.  And my tears.
Wells Fargo tends to have a pretty conservative strategy compared to many other banks. They've managed to stay largely out of the mess the other banks have been in because they've managed to keep their core bank away from the bad loans.
I'm not buying a ton of shit I can't afford.
Recall the Sony battery fiasco, when laptops were catching fire? Apple recalled 1.8 million batteries. Dell recalled 4.1 million batteries.   GM recalled 1 million cars recently because they could catch on fire.  Sorry, but as products get more and more complex, serious issues are bound to come up from time to time.  Price does not equal reliability, kid.
See that red area on the ground there? The one that used to be a red puddle that used to be a joke? Put your stick away, it's dead.
An euphemism?  Isn't it "a euphemism"?  Do you say "an yacht" or "an yo-yo"?
Does anyone know if she succeeded? I watched it a few times but can't remember.
ppl.
Try Celestia and Stellarium, two amazing open source apps if you want to understand or teach atronomy visually.
yea, only republicans can commit [sex crimes](http://www.freerepublic.com/focus/f-news/1980959/posts).
Yeah. For me the replaceable battery thing wasn't about how long the charge lasted - it was about pulling it out at the beginning of a five hour flight and realizing I hadn't charged it. :)  But then that was also a simpler time when I had less stuff to worry about charging. Now I have a charging stand and part of my "getting home" routine is plugging everything in, so maybe it's not a big deal any more.   I also use an iGo, so worst case I can charge on the go. 
&gt; The Israeli military said the target of the raid was a tunnel that they said Hamas was planning to use to capture Israeli soldiers positioned on the border fence 250m away.
What they need to do is subsidize gas more for buying American. Think in the long run, sheeple.
One..I did figure it our after things we discussed/linked between us would simultaneously show up here.  It was weird.
I kinda feel sorry for him. He was originally a NASA engineer, wasn't he? So it's not like there are other jobs he can get and I'm not sure he's old enough to retire. But he should have been more diplomatic with his new boss. 
No, but your argument rested on the fact that she "chose" to live there.  Your argument failed because your underlying assumption was false.  My opinion is that both sides are aggressors and both sides need to stop and talk to each other civilly.  To do this both sides need to understand that the other are people who also have a right to life.
Get a g/f to taxi you around.
The whole "in a court of law" thing is bullshit.  If there  was a court of law in this situation, the Israelis would have complained about Hamas shooting their guns into the air in the middle of  the night in a residential neighbourhood and the police and courts would have done something without the Israelis having to take the law into their own hands to protect themselves.  The whole problem here is that there is no higher authority with the mandate to pass judgement or the power to make sure its judgements are  enforced and obeyed.
From The Office:  David Brent: I gave a speech only this morning to my staff assuring them that there would not be cutbacks at this branch and there certainly wouldn't be redundancies, so...  Jennifer Taylor-Clark: Well, why on Earth would you do that?  David Brent: Why? Oh, don't know. A little word I think's important in management called morale.  Jennifer Taylor-Clark: Well, surely it's going to be worse for morale in the long run when there ARE redundancies and you've told people that there won't be.  [pause]  David Brent: They won't remember. 
...and is currently being questioned by TSA.
Let's be scientific here.  You mean _Crocodylus pontifex_
I see what *you* did there. Called a democratically elected Republican President, Democrat Congress and Democrat House '*the Bush Regime*'.  The *comrade* was sardonic irony about your Spartism.   Idiot.
Getting my first XBL points, and wanted some rec's on what to get.  Game add-ons, and XBLA games.  I have most AAA games.  
My experience differs from yours.
Yes... 'free', assuming that your definition of 'free' includes $99/£79 per year... (if you want to be able to run the games on a 360 that is)
Nothing to do with the first person perspective in the short film. See how much is going? Mirrors Edge ain't got shit on what I was commenting about. I'm all for running around roof's and such, but I was thinking "more enthralling".
So if you mix this with a liquor and get intoxicated, are you drunk with tentacle rape?
Doesn't this imply he's really weak? One Newton of force is actually a really small amount of force. It's like the weight of an apple.
No prior congress has ever ignored its impeachment responsibilities, so cowardly or so blindly.
Although the cutter has apparently attempted an equilateral triangle, they obviously ended up with scalene, which is definitely not isosceles. How the hell anyone can eat a scalene pizza when they clearly asked for isosceles is beyond me. Is there no pride in math at Pizza Hut?!
If you don't like to buy things like everybody else, get the fuck out of my country.  America.
How do you eat a box full of raw pork and not get some kind of food poisoning or disease?
Nimby was my 2nd favorite Gumby character after Pokey.
Separate by user, use Markov chains to taunt people.
I have a toshiba gigabeat t-series 4GB mp3 player and I turned it on today to use at the gym and a similar problem occurred.  I had to reset the device to power it on (using the reset button and a paper clip) and after the test screen displayed the device froze when the status bar was full.  WTF is up?
This is pretty funny to me. Recently a local city councilman spent 9,000 tax dollars on a giant electric moonpie with the idea of raising it on New Years Eve. The guy repeatedly said no city in the Central time zone dropped (or raised) any thing. He is convinced the city would get MILLIONS of dollars from tourist rushing in the see the giant moonpie. 
Wokka chikka bloopa chikka
Ugh, escort mission.
Never respond to spam!
I agree. Hamas has failed. They haven't been able to successfully use rocks to stop F16s from leveling their peoples' homes. Like I said, their human shields just keep getting blown up.
Grow some balls and confront her; oh, wait, you decided to ask reddit first.  You might have been able to talk her into an alternate plan.  Now, not so much.  Great job.
wat. and I'm baking a pie.
Fucking liberals,
The Zune just Red Ringed.
&gt;It's all about class. (No, not OOP classes - social class.)  Social classes (and the following class warfare etc) does not exist. It is just another one of Marx's silly ideas, but it is kept alive by people who needs a convenient excuse so they feel like they suck less.
And the internet's worst flash site.
What are the flaws, exactly? Aside from the flaws that exist in every computer, that is. Which newspapers have you read about these in?
Speaking as someone who actually deployed sophisticated web apps on various Windows server machines, of course I know what the fuck Hyper Threading is, although I suppose I'm not part of the contingent that masturbates to it, as you seem to be. And due to the magic of HT, my machine sees 8 cores on 4 chips, and that's all I care about. Apple didn't have to plaster "HYPER THREADING" stickers all over my box for me to care.  And I'm sorry to break the news that the Mac Pro (NOT the "Macbook Pro" as you apparently read it as) has a [full-fledged NVidia 8800GT](http://gallery.mac.com/peter.marreck#100250/IMG_1125&amp;bgcolor=black) inside, and is still kicking ass, even at 2560x1600 resolution of 30 inch goodness (Dell Ultrasharp 3008WFP)  If I can sell it at half the cost, WHO THE FUCK CARES why? The point is you can. And that money goes directly to defraying the cost of the NEXT mac purchase. ;) Troll on, son
Pics or it didn't happen.
jquery plugin, if your to lazy to view source to figure out why your looking at this.
He was taken out [by a cat](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tyrannosaurus_Reich).
&gt;launching a rocket into deep space means using lots of rocket fuel   Wrong.  You only need as much the gravitational potential energy on Earth and additional kinetic energy, such that it doesn't come back to Earth.  &gt;spectacular sudden explosion.  Depleted Uranium is not explosive.  What are you talking about?  In my opinion, nuclear is the best option when considering scalability, sustainability, environmental impact and most importantly, economically feasible.  Solar is a good option as well, but the technology is not economical yet.   What is wrong with having spent nuclear fuel stored in a remote location anyway?  It's not that big of a risk.  We fucking do it all the time right now.
Considering the inflation that has occurred in restaurant portion sizes over the last couple of decades, I doubt that.  But, you could be right.
you scare me
Quite a pick, a little too many 'vote up if' posts for my liking though.
Great post, I agree with most of it (and I'm a prof, which becomes relevant below).  The problem is that there is a circular problem with the definition of best here. Only an extremely arrogant person would assume that the system that picked them picked the best. No, the system picked the people it picked, and we TRIED to make a test that picked the 'best' whatever the hell that means.   Most professors have no training in test design, have never spent time looking at breadth measures of excellence, and have limited experience outside of academia, because they went from ugrad to grad to postdoc to prof as quickly as possible. So their definition of 'best' is bizarre and their knowledge of the context of broad knowledge is limited to non-existent.   Profs pick test questions that they would excel at, pick the best students to be their grad students, and the cycle repeats.  Who is to say that the 'best' student isn't a C student:  1) Didn't give a shit about the stupid artificial assignment given in class, was busy doing dev work for her startup...  2) Doesn't worship the sub-sub-discipline that the prof is the worlds expert at, thinks it worth knowing something about, but not enough to get an A, especially since  3) In a lot of cases really good, critical thinking students recognize that for most profs getting an A means agreeing with them.  I've struggled with this for years. I assume I'm one of the worst at this (I'm in no position to judge myself the exception) so I've done the following:  a) reduce the significance of tests; use projects instead; have these projects wherever possible come from outside sources  b) have all major work that I find contentious read by another reader, someone at arms length. In some courses I have all work read by a second reader.   c) have students do some of the marking - especially for presentations - and provide feedback to each other.  I also interview a few of the top and bottom students in each class once they've graduated (so they can speak their mind). Most of the points above came from those discussions. Painful at times but ...   I really worry that the best student, the one with the critical difference, will end up with a C in my or some other course and so not end up in grad school, and not end up being the person to really make a difference.   Anyway, I agree with your points but I really worry about the circularity of our system of determining excellence and entitlement to be a prof.
wouldn't it be more entertaining to see the hosts or whatever freezing to death, or if a random storm hits or something.
I'd rather it doesn't happen in my lifetime. :P
They could if they had 3+ billion dollars of military aid per year.
nice, but I meant as to why/if life was created.
Ummm... so smooth...
http://kr.blog.yahoo.com/funnyblog/1281311?c=3 **totally looks like** www.totallylookslike.com!
Have you seen him hawk the [Slap Chop](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pPKtBM99kAc)?
Torture will do that to you. 
Does Reddit dislike blacks as much as it dislikes Israel?
They used to put people like them into asylums.
You have obviously never been in a desert with no moon in the sky.
It depends... Where do you live?
I last about 16 seconds.
You know it's time to get off of Reddit when you get the urge to make a comment like this:   AAAAAAARRRRRRRRRRRGGGGGGGGGGGHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH!
I guess that means nobahdi isn't.
violentacres is a dumb nazi fuck who hates Muslims, Jews, Blacks and anyone else proscribed by the KKK. Spending most of his time between homo-erotic sites and sites with child porn, he still manages to proclaim his hatred for "ragheads," "kikes," and "niggers."
I hit Cmd-W.
i use a program called leximancer for my phd work, analysing word frequency and association in political blogs, but it works with any text input.   http://www.leximancer.com/
Blog spam containing wishful thinking.
We pay them to kill the other, and then we  provide care for the other.  Why?   "Hey, they didn't get injured enough the first time out.  Let's throw em out again and we'll blow 'em up real good this time." America - #1 at Fail
Yes, it's been around that long.  No idea how it's still around.
That is the kind of awesome that makes me quietly say, "yeeeesss" without thinking.
The CEOs of Monsanto who served up those batches of pus-laden milk must be living it up right now. Corporate behavioural incentives are way out of whack. A performance bonus and share options - what sort of punishment is that??
that's what the edit link is for.
I agree. If you've seen his various appearances on Howard Stern you know how crazy he can be...sober. (He claims to never drink or get high any more)  "I'm lovin' my sobriety"
Zot?
HAPPY NEW YEAR *poops on the couch* IM SO SORRY ILL CLEAN IT UP IN THE MORNING LOL
Does anyone care? No.
Upvoted for saying first mostly what I said, because I was too hasty to tell this guy he's a pussy.  I liked your added bit of suicide.  I don't like McCain, however.
What the shit, it's from 2007?
Color  "Faint, deep-sky objects often disappoint beginning observers due to the lack of brilliant color as seen in the published imaging results. The reason for this is again due to the physical nature of our natural detector. Remember that only the cones are sensitive to color. Unfortunately, they are also insensitive to low light levels compared to the rods. Thus at low light levels we are using just our rods and making black and white detections. M42 is one of the only nebulae with high enough surface brightness to stimulate at least some people’s cone cells (this varies greatly from person to person)."  http://ocw.mit.edu/NR/rdonlyres/Earth--Atmospheric--and-Planetary-Sciences/12-409Hands-On-Astronomy--Observing-Stars-and-PlanetsSpring2002/BB9B21E9-0D51-4F74-A4CA-5B2FB00F73AF/0/handout6_sp2002.pdf
Pretty funny. More like two groups of "liberal" self important douche bags.
This is my favorite part:  &gt;Advances in computers have permitted the use of three-dimensional models of bomb components. These have shown that earlier two-dimensional models were dangerously misleading. Apparently, the danger was greater than had been appreciated that an accidental explosion could cause dispersal of radioactive materials or even a nuclear yield  "Oh hey guys, it looks like we were pretty close to having no clue whatsoever what we were doing."
hottest chick EVER!!
They run the gamut from hilarious to gruezune...
That's great and all, but there are so many other great introductory articles about climate change. This "newglobalwarmingeffects" is really sloppy stuff.  Such as the [NASA Jet Propulsion Laboratory's "Eyes on the Earth"](http://climate.jpl.nasa.gov/ "seriously this looks like blogspam that a layman whipped up in two minutes")
Strange because the Zunes are much better.  Apart from being frozen.
Ha!  You linked to a historicist!?  Further, it's only not scientific if you define "scientific" in a manner that fits the conclusions you want to draw.  (As you've done).  I still see no point in this.  The argument was regarding the labor theory of value, not how to define "science."
Dog knows just what it wants and gets it.
That really does explain a lot...
People being able to eat is the least of our worries.  Think about what it's doing to the beer prices!
&gt; ever  That's how we got into the mess with IPv4's limited address space.  I'm pretty sure there's a James Bond film title that's relevant here.
I suggest that a "religion" based on verifiable premises is a misnomer. Depending on the case, I might call it a philosophy, an art, a code of ethics, a science or something else. The dictionaries I use insist that religions are based on belief in the supernatural. Then again, I might start using a different dictionary if one makes a convincing case.
in certain areas where time warner provides cable services... thanks for making that seem more dramatic than it actually was...
I got the 1st generation one by a competitor of www.emotiv.com for xmas. It came to market in October.  I have been learning to use it and i can now play pong as it helps adapt to you and vice versa using that boring game. Its more based on muscles at 1st, but over time you dont need to flex them, just think about it.. It can tell where your eyes are looking. I think we are about to see a revolution in how we use computers. My purpose for the device was not just my FPS games, but for content creation in the Virtual Worlds. Check this out, for the price I seriously recommend this to any and all gamers and geeks....  http://www.ocztechnology.com/products/ocz_peripherals/nia-neural_impulse_actuator  One word of caution, it takes a good while to master the thing and you need patience and persistence, otherwise this is not for you, not yet anyhow..
I like how Dora is wearing a Katatonia shirt.
yes...that is the point...They can try all they want but are afforded very little opportunity..even your article states they are waiting for Israeli permission to leave...that is ludicrous...You can't abuse these people and leave them no opportunity to provide for themselves...1.5 million people living in a 300km ghetto
You can create and run the games on your PC. For Free. You can also get a student's discount on the Creator's Club account.
Anyone notice the kid who asks the question is Pinochio from the FABLES series?
So is that.
Canada. I would expect it to have a script that tracks your IP address or something, then put the according message, but perhaps it's just generally *NO* until it's the same answer for everyone.
Do you learn your history from the back of corn flakes boxes?
I have a roomate that is $120,000 in debt for art school. The girl has no idea how much she's going to make, if she will even be able to get a job and she spends the money she has on all sorts of crap. I think half of her plan is for her fiance to pay her loans for her when she finishes school.
Should be called same.gov, since they censor questions on cannabis they don't like off of the front page.
Am I the only one who got thrown by the "Bush threatening martial law or another 9/11" bit in the middle?  It was like a 2-paragraph injection of crazy into an otherwise good article.  If I'm misinterpreting this I would love for someone to give me a rational explaination.
A little asinine?  No - I don't give them money because they don't do what they say they do.  Full Stop.  Seeing as how the USSC has ruled that it is an individual right what excuse do they currently have for not supporting it?
[Spot on.](http://www.weebls-stuff.com/wab/hentai/)
I saw Tracy Morgan a few years ago and he managed to commit about 3/4ths of his set to large penis jokes and anal sex (and combinations thereof). I lol'd.
Holy shit - this is indeed far more terrifying:  &gt;before being driven back to his home dimension by a housecat which changes sizes when agitated.  Kitten Kong lives!!!
Are you part of a local group of people?  I'm fortunate enough to live on the Jersey shore so I get to walk a block to the beach and run in the sand.  Some people look at me a little funny, especially during the winter, but I've only ever seen one other person running on the beach.  How long have you been doing it?  I really messed up my knees running for years in shoes.  I've been doing the barefoot thing for about a year now and my knees feel great.  I always try and spread the word as much as possible, especially to all those people who have injured themselves running.
I have compassion for all races and colors excluding those currently promising to kill me and my family.
i had to read that twice ... 'cos it seemed so wrong :)
Ah, but nuclear reactors need steel as well!  But only [one-tenth as much](http://nextbigfuture.com/2008/07/per-peterson-information-on-steel-and.html).  What about concrete? Its manufacture releases vast amounts of CO2, from calcium carbonate (CaCO3) in limestone.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cement_kiln  Of course these amounts are small, per kWh, compared to fossil fuel.
Bah he needs to spend the next three years getting better at rethoric, so he can out speak Obama.
lets see, current rate of loss is $5M a year they have $30M of startup capital left, so yeah a few more years left.
where's the steam?
I'll tell you what... until Gonzales is in prison I'm NOT going to STFU.  This guy needs to serve prison time. The inability to find a job is the least of his concerns.  
She's probably Arabic.
You got the cigar right?  title you hat to the left.
Something is fishy here, but I did not research it at all. I didn't even RTFA, but anyway:  &gt; Morris was hardly the only Israeli liberal dispirited by Arafat’s behavior in 2000 and the suicide bombs and re-occupations that followed; nor was he alone in his gloom after September 11th. But his new language came as a shock. He described the Arab world as “barbarian,” and said that the Israeli massacres committed in 1947-48 were “peanuts” compared with those in Bosnia. Then, there was his call to build “something like a cage” for the Palestinians: “I know that sounds terrible. It is really cruel. But there is no other choice. There is a wild animal that has to be locked up in one way or another.” Upon reflection, even Morris was appalled by those words and later apologized. [here](http://www.newyorker.com/arts/critics/books/2008/05/05/080505crbo_books_remnick?currentPage=all)
I only have so many tears. I suggest a t-shirt slogan campaign to prioritize needless death. Keep it tasteful though.
Here, let me help you out...[1984](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nineteen_Eighty-Four)
Spaghetti breakfast, the drink.
Happened to me when I lived in the US... cancelled a check and the way the bank operated was to change the check's status to 'cashed' and the amount to $99,999,999,999, unfortunately they missed a 9 and ended up debiting the account by just shy of $10B. Because it appeared to the system as a valid check, the account balance was -$100M on day 1, and -$10B on day 2.  The funniest part was when they started calling up asking when we planned on repaying the $10 billion we owed them. They were dead-pan serious about it too, fucking retards.
There isn't anything I wouldn't keep until the warranty is up - so long as you don't mind losing it for up to a week at a time. And assuming I lived near a dealer. With the Jaguar, the nearest dealer was over an hour away. Since we were in every 3-6 months that became an unbelievable pain in the ass.  And not all XXXX cars are crap. One of my relatives has a Jag, and that inspired me to get one. Hers hasn't been anywhere near as much trouble as ours. But once you've been through it once, it isn't something you feel like risking again.
*We Are Out of Stock!!!*  Oh how sad :(
Meh, I'd say that's pushing it. I'm not sure they like anything as much as they dislike Israel.
Here's mine: "No more than 15 minutes of digg a day."  "No more than 15 minutes of facebook a day."  "No more than 15 minutes of google reader a day."  "No more than 15 minutes of hacker news a day."  _____________________________________________ This will save me more time for reddit :P
heh, yeah, I thought that seemed a little to ripe for the picking.  But I had to do it anyway =-)  It's a compulsion
Bottom line in this situation is that the customer was upset, and that would hurt your business.  Customers are often stupid, loud, and arrogant, but you have to do what they want if you want their business.
And that.
Hmm.. been on 4chan much?  
Oz is getting too freaky.
Why bother?  Most of that movie *is* shit.
I started up Stellarium on my Windows PC after I wondered the same thing.  Freaky.  It's very clear, and the moon and Venus are very bright.  /Near Chicago
AP style does not agree.  Nineteen nineties would be 1990s.  If you were to say nineties -- as in, "the nineties" -- you'd say 90's.
Look out Grado, I'm getting an Amazon account.
Calgary, Alberta!  I'm in Ottawa all next week =D
&gt; typo's can happen to anyone ;-)  Indeed.
Anderson County Sheriff's department used to have a jailcam... Looks like it's coming back Jan 1, 2009  Here's their live radio comm audio stream in the meantime:  http://www.tnacso.net/scanner.php
This must be reputable; it's from the Daily Mail, and they got the guy to pose in a thoughtful manner.
Neither side abandoned efforts to prepare themselves for a renewal of hostilities; again, by that time it was perfectly clear to Hamas that Israel would not lift the blockade.
No Dig Day is all-year round for me.
Solution: wait 24 hours then reboot.
I'm going to live forever.
build more?
Yeah, I'll have $10K in debt from graduating from a state university because I knew that jobs when I graduated weren't guaranteed and I didn't want to be burdened by debt. 
There are good comments, and there are funny comments.  I like the occasional humorous comment. If you want to read dry boring articles go to a technical library.
Applies to new NFL fans too.
Close the curtains.
While I was watching the video, I kept thinking of Fallout 3 and quick-save.  That's one of the easiest things to help people get into the game. For the hardcore and those seeking a more intense experience like you described, maybe that should be an option for a new game, to disable quick-save for that instance/character.
A tips sir. Dont bother. In matters of a few years, everyone can own theire own nuclear reactor. 
Its not supposed to happen, but I guess it is normal. There is a tissue down there called a frenulum. It is supposed to get longer in puberty, but for some people that doesn't happen, and it is too short to let the foreskin retract, thus causing ripping.
Supporting one side over the other is gross intellectual ignorance combined with irrational political motives.  Both sides swim in the shit on this one.
It took them so long to get the click in quick succession (double click) down that they don't want to give it up now.
Any computer that can handle HL2 can easily handle Morrowind, or virtually any other game worth playing for that matter.
This is what democracy looks like!
Your explanation was interesting, but I need to comment on this:  &gt; During an arrest, a police officer needs to act like an authority figure.  There is a difference between authoritarianism and authority. As I've said before: The righteous are granted authority. The wrongful assume it. And assumed authority isn't true authority at all. A proper authority figure would not behave like that, and wouldn't need to -- in fact, it would be counterproductive. [Alternative approaches exist](http://garda.ie/faq.html#G4), and I have witnessed them in action e.g. in Ireland. They're quite efficient, and avoid what you describe as "arrest mode", even when arresting someone. (That's not to say that terrible shit hadn't gone down in Ireland as well, in terms of excessive police violence -- it has. But this is not as common.)  In any case, thank you for your reply.
Er, I think you missed his point.  He didn't say that there are plenty of good non-Christians, he said that there are numerous amounts of both good and bad Christians; not that I wish to contest either point.
274!
People tell others that it's an investment. That it'll pay for itself. I know so many people who think this so they just keep taking more and more loans.
If that is the problem then just require DNA or similar material as proof before you convict.
Natural Language Toolkit: http://www.nltk.org/ WordNet: http://wordnet.princeton.edu/
[Yes.](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/7mjdk/does_anyone_else_not_drink/)
John McClain is never the wrong guy.
Actually, there was a federal law passed in April 2003 that explicitly states that "Police" t-shirts count as police impersonation and are therefore illegal:  http://snipurl.com/law_eforcement_imper
avoid "rubbing" alcohol if you can.  It contains oils meant to lube your skin, you don't want that in your bong.  Get the "97% pure isopropyl alcohol" (or something like that) in the drug store.
Oh thank God, maybe he'll stop doing comedy now.
No, if you do a little research, you find that both elections were subject to vote fraud irregularities.  In other words, both elections were stolen. Half the electorate, or more, is guiltless.
Shouldn't that be: Vote up if you want to see Reddit top posts for the year
In the US it's not politically feasible. Period.
In spite of my name, we usually keep our body fluids to ourselves. That being said there are other ways to fuck a customer. 
1. I didn't say Zionism is one and the same as supporting Jews. I said Zionism is one and the same as Israeli patriotism (and extreme Zionism is one and the same as Israeli chauvinism, but isn't that true for patriotism in general?).  2. I don't see why Zionism and a Palestinian state can't coexist.
Rather nice these are. I really like the second one.
Confucius very [*wrong*](http://img.photobucket.com/albums/v420/irf/yikes.jpg)
Also according to Hamas, who want 1000 arab prisoners for Gilad Shalit, and Hezbollah, who took 1000 arab prisoners for Eldad Regev and Ehud Goldwasser, and then it turned out they were dead.
I think we may have to adopt that game for telly...  ...An episode of CSI should pretty much wreck us.  
Umm... A festering hotbed of terrorists? People shooting their AK-47s into the air and launching rockets at others?  When you exaggerate about an already fucked up situation, and then have the lack of sense to compare gaza to Warsaw, you show that you have not read any history and have no familiarity with the topics you are ranting about.  At this point, one side needs to step back and stop shooting. In all my years of this shit, I have seen these constants:   1. Someone sets off a car bomb or launches a rocket or blows up a night club and the act is claimed by a moslem faction.  2. Israel blows the fuck out of anyone in the vicinity.  3. The international community of pacifists are appalled.  4. A cease-fire is reached.  5. Talks of lasting peace occur.  6. Some murderer purporting to be moslem does a GOTO: 0001   Do you know how many millions of dollars Yasar Arafat died with? How do you think he got them?
&gt; You're still supposed to use names that are strings in some encoding.  Says you.  Care to back that up?  &gt; I tried strace -ff on my text editor. Almost all the files were dynamically linked libraries. That means the path comes from a config file saying where my libraries are (a directory named lib) and a name chosen by the library authors.  That's not exactly what's happening. The dynamic linker is *searching* for libraries where it takes path-stems and attaches some other path-stem. This is a purely binary operation- the system does not decode the characters used in the "configuration file" according to any locale or character-set; it doesn't care at all if the paths are even valid for the filesystem they're being used on.  The operating system (well, dynamic loader in this case) simply treats them as byte-arrays because *there is no benefit whatsoever in treating them as strings*, and there's a significant cost: Transcoding all of those strings back and forth for no reason at all.  That's exactly what Mono and Python and Java and Perl and Haskell are doing, of course: They're transcoding something that makes no sense to transcode, and when they have a coding error, they waste time, and lose data.  For what? Why exactly is this valuable? All so that the error can be detected in `os.readdir()` instead of `print()`?  A "pathname" data type which transcodes *when the decoded result is needed* makes far more sense to me.  &gt; I don't see what you're trying to prove with your discussion of sort order and syntax.  That files are a special case, and not mere "strings", nor some special kind of "string" (which I'm using interchangeably with "character-array").  Treating them as strings is what causes the problem, and there's no clear gain. There is however, a very big cost: anywhere from data corruption or data loss at worst, to unexpected (or unhandled) exceptional cases.
It happens if you take pictures everywhere you go. It's nothing unique to Thomas Hawk.  I've lost count of the number of times I've been stopped by a police officer while standing on public property with my tripod out. Private security guards are even worse; they're twice as oboxious as the police but without the actual authority to back them up.  Heck, one time I was standing in a place called *Liberty* State Park, taking pictures of the Statue of *Liberty*, and I was yelled at by a rent-a-cop who told me I was not allowed to take [photos of the vehicle bridge going to Ellis Island](http://maps.google.com/?ie=UTF8&amp;ll=40.701203,-74.043072&amp;spn=0.00305,0.006974&amp;t=h&amp;z=18) for "security" reasons. Apparently the irony was completely lost on him.
what is an arab?
Well, I went to check, but it turns out I installed Vimperator. Huh. In any case, I maintain that selecting *words* in a URL is utterly silly behavior.
Your user name indicates that you are an expert in hot chick rooms.
Aaaaaaargh...
It won't. The perceived popularity of adblock among the general population is a distortion of the reddit reality bubble.   There's roughly [5-6million people using adblock on FireFox](https://preview.addons.mozilla.org/en-US/statistics/addon/1865) (use the drop-down on the left and select "Average Daily Users"), out of [roughly 60 million daily users](http://blog.mozilla.com/basil/2008/06/29/state-of-the-add-ons-ecosystem/). That means 90% aren't using adblock; and FF users (anecdotally) are much more likely to adopt such an add-on.   I don’t use it, because I believe if a website is good enough to make me tolerate the ads, then they have earned their keep. They deserve the benefits of making money from ads. On sites which I visit only by reddit link, I have my own subconscious adblock builtin. Even though they display, I couldn't tell you what they were.
Do python windows programmers often make windows system calls?
It's _title_ text.
I think in the 1984 translation, they use "Grande Irmão" (the literal translation). "Irmão mais velho" means older brother.
Ron Who?
They're called zeros. And what the heck is a MoT?
What she did wrong was -- from my understanding of the article -- is that she failed to either divorce or murder each husband prior to marrying the next one,  which is the commonly accepted MO in this line of business.
I dated this girl once.  She would type things out on a typewriter.  She said it was better than a PC.  This was in 2004, and she was 23.  No one growing up at that age even used a typewriter.  That was just one of the many symptoms, though it never stopped here from renting terrible dance movies on DVD.
I would have pissed in my fucking pants.
AULD Lang Syne, dammit, AULD! 
That's what she said.
You may perhaps, and thats great... but the nations that put on about all this really dont.  Or else they would do more to help.  
You need a girl with a nice ass and big tits maybe?
One trick pony is trickless.
I really don't feel any different.
No, at all, because you can choose to ignore dependency issues if it comes down to that (and because pacman's dependency resolver is much less pedantic that apt's, it pretty much never does).
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wars_of_Israel  1948 : Arab nations attacked the fledgling state of Israel.  1967 : Egypt lined up 100,000 troops and 1000 tanks on the border with Israel so Israel struck first.  1982 : PLO in southern Lebanon shell Israel, Israel responds.  2006 : Hezbollah raid Israeli territory, capture and kill Israeli solders. Israel responds.
[Too late.](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/7mof0/88yearold_woman_has_her_home_penetrated_goes_nuts/7qxg)
when I was in University, I got two of these from school.  I downloaded quite a bit (50 mbit connection!!!), and i guess i was just a statistic when I did get caught. All I had to do was email them and tell them I deleted the movie, and promise to never do it again.  which I than promptly ignored with the advent of peerguardian.  I never got another letter again
what's best is that all the google ads are for actual hummers and dealers, so they're paying to be mocked. 
Because I couldn't read this without you.
Canada
i'm really interested: why would anyone vote this down? it's both an hommage and a semi-ironic nod to alan moore and in no way derogatory. the writing is dark and witty and it's one of these gems that deserve universal acclaim. is it a re-post? too old? wrong subreddit? not enough lolcat?  btw credit goes to andyman messiah from the codex who dug out this nugget.
Alberta
Calgary
the adage holds true, "fake it til you make it"
Original Comic: http://www.legorobotcomics.com/?id=34 Not that funny but hey, whatever. 
Everything is "white culture"-- that's the point of a separate center. 
But nowhere near Uranus.
Because they are spending tax payer money, everyone is real fucking generous when spending other peoples money. Fuck.
Should be fun listening this New Year's Eve.
pure stupidity. bush JR was so crazy christian that all these arguments fail.
hey thanks, but it's gonna be like -20C with the wind chill tonight - no way am i gonna stand there to watch some concert haha   i guess i'll just drink...
It says so in the Danish articles :)  It also says they were peddling hair products at a stand in the mall - which might be a better motive than them being Israeli :P
you
I see one of them is a sound mixer. Does Java now have good libraries for multimedia apps like this, or would they have had to do everything from scratch? The lack of good multimedia libraries, and the community's stated disinterest in them, is the main thing that's kept me from the platform (with a good jvm language, maybe scala). That particular app is closed-source, unfortunately.
This whole conversation is bullshit. Yesterday Israeli government made a wise decision to suspend school teaching. Today, a rocket hit a school in an empty class. Thirty children would have died. That their rockets are shit and that we know how to avoid them doesn't mean we should allow them to shoot at their convenience. 
So true. So depressing but so true. 
I love you all. that is all. 
You are correct, however I have an uncontrollable urge to point out that what you have described is a stipulated damage clause which is unenforceable.  Liquidated damage clauses are stipulated damages clauses which ARE enforceable. My 1L contracts prof would be very upset if I did not know this. 
covering an estuary.
I hear they have macaroni and cheese in America.  I can get you some for the right price.
Did you just say "'Procrastinigger'-ish"?  My first piece of advice to help yourself would be to stop saying that word.
in a hundred years people will barely remember the USA.
who is doug wilson? he's number one now.
No flask = No gangster.
This is really depressing, I now remember the last time I saw the real sky was when back in 2000.
Technically, the jews have their own new year so they couldn't careless.   Leave Ghaza alone, power abusers.
youre an idiot. The end of each year Ukraine and Russia renegotiate the gas contract for next year. Currently, Europe pays &gt;$400 for their gas (for 1000 cubic meters), Russia wants $250 for 1000 cubic meters from Ukraine for next year. Ukraine doesnt want to pay this "much" (even though its half the price of the rest of Europe). What the hell do you expect Russia to do?  And when Russia DOES cut off Ukraine for not paying their bill, Ukraine siphons off the gas destined for Europe in the transit pipes, and Russia gets blamed. How does that make ANY sense?
Everyone knows how the conflict of the middle east ends.  Seriously, we all know deep down that the differences between the people of that part of the world will only be solved by violence. They have irreconcilable differences. These people are all such that it could not possibly be any other way then through violence. To both sides,tactical victory is a divine thing. They believe G-d is guiding them. Have not the last however many decades made this abundantly clear. Warmongers will do what Warmongers do right or wrong, and those who get in the way pay with their lives. Same applies everywhere pretty much. Maybe its best if they all just fight it out already and get this over with so the world can get on with itself. Its high time we all stop worrying about the despicable backwards middle east!!! Seriously, FUCK THE MIDDLE EAST!!! Let them all fight to the bitter end already! Concern yourselves with North America and Europe folks.....  NO BS.. WE got plenty to do in our own nations... In case you didn't get the memo right wing fascists are rapidly stripping us of our civil rights and methodically allowing the middle classes to evaporate. We can't help the hapless Palestinians because we cannot even run our own nations... Don't you see? Its all to distract you while the Billionaires make off with the gold!!! Same Shit, different century.
Another explanation of these data is found in Barlow, Sakheim, and Beck's ( 1983) theory of the role of anxiety and attention in sexual responding. It is possible that viewing homosexual stimuli causes negative emotions such as anxiety in homophobic men but not in nonhomophobic men. Because anxiety has been shown to enhance arousal and erection, this theory would predict increases in erection in homophobic men. Furthermore, it would indicate that a response to homosexual stimuli is a function of the threat condition rather than sexual arousal per se. Whereas difficulties of objectively evaluating psychoanalytic hypotheses are well-documented, these approaches would predict that sexual arousal is an intrinsic response to homosexual stimuli, whereas Barlow's (1986 ) theory would predict that sexual arousal to homosexual stimuli by homophobic individuals is a function of anxiety. These competing potions can and should be evaluated by future research. http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/pages/frontline/shows/assault/roots/freud.html
Righty, I accept your grudging concession. Though I can't help thinking that they just don't make zionist cyberwarriors like they used to. I mean they used to have at least *a couple* of functional brain cells to rub together. You don't even seem to possess that.   
The author of the article claims that any stimulus, fiscal or monetary, will be counter-productive.  Handing out money to consumers would fall under the umbrella of fiscal stimulus.  On a side note, banks aren't sitting on the money - they're busy buying a crap load of Treasury bills at historically low (even negative!) rates.  :(
Here's mine..it'll probably be longer than I (or you) want:  In Feb I was told by the man I've been in a relationship for over 20 years that he wanted out (17 of those married). I was hurt, angry, the whole bit, and didn't really believe him. Then little things fell into place, and for the first time ever, it occurred to me to check our phone records. That's when I found what I never wanted to see. He had caught up with old family friends...one in particular. I got some emails sent to me through someone at his work, which confirmed my worst fears. They were having an emotional affair, which to me was worse than just plain fucking for the sake of being horny. Everything I saw made me feel raw.... my life, as he told her, laid out for someone else who never should have known.   I lost my mind. I ended up checking myself into a mental hospital. I couldn't go home, so I went to a friend's house. That friend is 20+ years older than me, and since I didn't have the money to pay rent, I paid with sex instead. I felt like a total whore.  When I could no longer take it, I came home. By that time, a couple of my kids hated me---still not sure why, but they had no problems with calling me every name you could think of...and telling me they wished I had killed myself, and offering to get a rope to help me hang.   A few months later, he went to visit her halfway across the country. I was hurt and pissed, so a few wks later, I went back east to visit my best friend and let off some steam. I had no intention of doing anything "wrong" there, but we basically spent 2 wks drunk off our asses. In those 2 wks I managed to sleep with at least 3 people that I remember--one of them being a lesbian encounter. Before that trip, I'd only slept with 2 people in my life. I also think I was raped, but can't prove it. I just know I woke up with bruises in places I'd never had them before...and hurt in places I shouldn't have. I felt sick. Still do.  Through all of this, I'm still crazy in love with the one man who hurt me more than anyone in this lifetime could have. I've had a lot of shit go down in my life...including being raped several times when I was a kid, by a family member. But HE can still get to me like no one else ever has. 
I would think that there might be more fun in obliquely making the customer *believe* that you've messed with his food, when this is not the case.  Burger punk: "Double bacon cheeseburger...it's for a cop!"
And?
USA
Sorry, the title for the article was all caps. I should have changed it instead of pasting it. 
That's 3 trillion tons of rock.  Much easier to get your head around, right?
Depends on her metabolism. And the amount of muscle she's built up underneath that fat while trying to move 400 lbs. around the house. (The muscle gets metabolized quicker than the fat.)
STFU .net rulz!!
But its not a troll when the other side presents their own.  Fuck you, asshole.
SC
what are you trying to do with this code? it *looks* ok, i guess, but its impossible to know if there are problems with it given just the information you've provided. 
That's hilarious. Are there still cultures that have women that believe they can change the behavior of men by withholding sex? What do these women think they are, goddesses?
I'm going to attempt talking to a girl. In real life.
&gt;I like playing pool as well as playing Fallout 3. &gt;The Wii on an HDTV doesn't look terrible, but it is in dire need of a higher resolution or anti-aliasing. Uhhhh... what was that about AA? The 360 and ps3 don't have AA either, and Fallout 3 has more jaggies than any game I've ever seen in my life.  &gt;Just because, with enough hacking and special effects, Nintendo is able to make their console into something great does not mean it is.  Christ, that is the dumbest thing I have ever read. There is no hacking and special effects, it is simply a good design team and decent programmers. Do you have *any idea* how much harder it is to code for the PS3 than it is for the Wii? All the "hacking" is on that side of the field, where you have to jump through hoops to get even decent results out of an absurdly complex architecture. 
Not the way I teach a dog to sit. Is this anatomic correct?
You bet, it's mass storage compatible. More specs and review are [here](http://www.anythingbutipod.com/archives/2007/04/cowon-iaudio-d2-review.php).
In our area of Ontario, real local types say "yous" instead of you. As in "yous wanna come down tonight?" "Are yous guys goin' ice fishing?" "So what are yous up to?" 
Charleston Area. 
No. Some other people calling themself Japanese did that. Most of those people are dead now, and the people who protest weren't born at that time.  It is about as stupid as blaming all Germans for Hitler.
i'm surprised she asked for popcorn and not Outback Cheese Fries
2CB
Or, I didn't say [competing arbitration firms are states], but rather said something more accurately paraphrased as, [arbitration firms are one of the aspects of states], which rather reasonably gives evidence to the previous assertion that you do indeed use "paraphrase brackets to put words in people's mouth, skewing arguments by building up straw men and systematically tearing them down."  This would be in addition to trying to intimate and belittle those around you (while propping up your own apparently fragile ego) by offering a false either/or insisting that you are either the only educated, or the only serious person in the discussion.   Other alternatives could include: that you are obviously mistaken, or that your viewpoint is valid but not (necessarily or obviously) sound.  Including these possibilities in your thought and thus allowing for them in your communication would greatly enhance your own intellectual development, but that does not appear to be one of your goals.
Dumb Election Judge is Found Dead. 
Israelis are ALSO arab. What you really are trying to imply is "muslim". 
yes. If I'm in BC then Vancouver. I'll likely be in toronto tho.
Nowt new here. Used in UK for years.
Here is better than where I was, but I still want to leave the US.
High, drunk...whatever. Funny is funny.
AND THEN THEY EAT HIM BLOOD AND GUTS INTESTINES DRIBBLING DOWN THEIR NECKS OUT OF THEIR MOUTHS ALL OVER THE GRISLED CARPET AND THE DOG IS STILL ALIVE JESUS CHRIST
Equilateral triangles are also isosceles triangles, just like how squares are also rectangles.  &gt;In any case this would be pretty difficult to do since the third side is actually an arc.   I think that might have been why the pizza was cut the way it was. The alternative would have been to cut off all of the crust so the normal slices had flat edges.
You have failed to prove that it is useless.  Feel free to produce the full set of terms in all relevant languages and the number of references for each. Or are you say the idea is pointless, if so why bring up the other languages. Perhaps your thoughts are not as coherent as you think?
Looking at your other comments through your profile, I see this is just how you converse normally.  I'll try not to take offense, though I think you may find benefit in seeking help for your Tourette's.
If there are many women like this then I need to start developing the vibrator design that has been in my head for a long long time.
I didn't realize relevance had anything to do with importance. Sorry for being an ass.
Unless that was a joke over my head, it's nothing like that
There are so many things to look for. At a bookstore today, there was a big stack of a hip new diet book. The author covered how you should cut out sugar, most carbohydrates, most dairy, most meat, and additives. Then she got to what you should eat - fruit salad and lots and lots of soy, a bit of whole grain. http://www.nytimes.com/2007/08/01/books/01skin.html
how is this NSFW?
"The title is in a text node of the document, so it is not parsed in the same language. It is quoted code."  Thankyou mister obvious, nice to ruin the whole html-tag gimick/joke.  Anyway, we are all incorrect, since no "ask"-tag exists in the xhtml dtd ;)
What is brown sauce anyways?
Pixelsilk is an excellent website to visit.  Pixelsilk is a content management system with search engine optimization technologies built-in.  This is important for companies struggling to create and maintain optimal website achieving superior rankings in search engine results.  
Israel has no reason to attack anyone unless attacked first. Hamas does: this is their only way to draw sufficient attention without being forced into negotiation with concessions - and the first order of such concessions would be abolition of Hamas.  IDF is looking for a way around that process.
I'm uncut. I have been told I am better in bed. However, I think in my case I was trying harder *because* I was uncut. I felt different growing up. When I hit puberty I was scared of girls not liking me because of it, so I made sure I was a good fuck so I wouldn't look stupid. I compensated for my perceived lack. I am almost ashamed that empirical data is telling me that it wasn't really me all along, but my dick.
I bought a cheap vap from this guy: http://shop.ebay.com/merchant/kai_trading_corp  It's cheap, it works.  The volcano is better, but not for almost $500 more.  One thing.  You'll want to hang the box vap from the back side so the weed stays horizontal when it's inserted in the vap.
I find it incredible that MS would let such a thing happen, This issue is about crappy programming and poor testing. How embarrassing for MS, Just what they don't need more bad publicity about a crappy product.  I now have no faith and trust that MS will look after me as a customer.
Somehow I doubt this girl has a fast metabolism...
&gt; For example, you have a list of names and you need to get a smaller list with all names that start with "I."  VB LINQ  Dim smallerList = (From name In Names Where name.StartsWith("I.")).ToList VB Lambda  Dim smallerList = Names.Where(function (n) n.StartsWith("I.")) VB's LINQ support is actually better that C#'s because it supports the reduce keyword, Aggregate, and doesn't require Select. &gt; What would you like instead of DirectCast and the c# (type) syntax? My requirements are 1. Parens shouldn't be required  2. It should be clear what is being converted  3. Multiple in-line conversions should look clean. Something resembling the dot-notation for function calls might fit the bill.  handle = someObject$IFoo.GetHandle$IntPtr Read as, "SomeObject is cast to an IFoo, GetHandle is called on it, and then that result is cast to an IntPtr." Much better than   handle = DirectCast(DirectCast(someObject, IFoo).GetHandle, IntPtr) or   handle = (IntPtr)( (IFoo)someObject).GetHandle() EDIT: While I maintain VB is just fine for collection, it does suck when you want to use new goodies like Parallel.For.
Both of these men suck giant tubes of shit.
Getting my first XBL points, and wanted some rec's on what to get. Game add-ons, and XBLA games. I have most AAA games.
In North Korea they get neither the food nor the happy ending, and they still thank Kim Jong-Il profusely.
They'll embed it directly in your content.  At a certain point you will simply have to put up with ads... bandwidth isn't free.
You pissed off the Moderator by dis-respecting their choices.  You handled your concern with total lack of aplomb, and as a result you got pinged apparently where it upsets you.... just what was intended as punishment.  STOP WHINING!!! 
Seriously. Even Hebrew is a middle eastern language. Submitter is a clearly an Israeli sympathizer.
How come it's "they" and not "we"?  Does it help you sleep better at night?
That sucks! Hopefully that's the worst thing that'll happen to you this year :).
could be correlation, not causation. you don't know what he's got going in the other browser window.
&gt; Israel took this land from the Palestinians and dispossessed them.  How hard is it to read about Israel's history a bit before having an opinion?  It's definitely *MUCH* more complicated. And btw, Palestinian leaders did not accept Israel's right to existence until early 1990s.. 
Happy:  1367159162 9795181391 0754710345 8279145430 7330129470 7985931863 8537389138 0634012259  1573541927 8746324830 4067897688 6892050488 2711503311 3921225931 3737498600 1533618345  0714281870 9525233993 0156436680 6895247404 1712862439 2976316127 3137655654 7734409992  5664594619 6489606567 2650172562 6069356292 5103542070 8414972395 7622716886 0522222837  5340685733 7453604229 2439927660 4571893291 9018880455 6401960925 0377547836 5388943322  5249733593 1354982426 0605936569 97346
Australia
Hamas supporters mass flag videos that show Hamas supporters loading rockets and firing them from civilian areas.
It doesn't seem to work for me. Oh well...
Where are you going to go?
Damn fucked world... That news gave me an unpleasant surprise.
New:  1681494611 9654806877 5947343656 1349917146 8322958320 1547119986 7544994993 4516028257  4317104266 6271235782 5516782198 1484124167 4969651215 8448746796 8508888983 0676579762  8491221886 4015067639 2993876880 3962117675 9300312821 0842506234 4920729443 9721596898  4699942434 0466252999 9633959162 0461757331 8605919592 1522555820 0826522590 2991336656  2581780831 4260214500 6180588741 8939241572 2219402494 0881038553 1683883661 4489900166  7924053234 6823986014 0750417733 8808689
http://finance.google.com/finance?q=INDEXDJX:.DJI%20INDEXNASDAQ:.IXIC%20INDEXSP:.INX  I've had this bookmarked for months, and they almost ALWAYS move in lock-step since the crash started. I agree, heavy market manipulation, and I think a lot of the gains the market makes after it falls are reflecting the drop in the value of the dollar - if the companies are still worth about the same across the board, the markets indexes will move upwards in lock-step as they keep their same valuation with regards to a lower dollar - lower dollar with set valuation leads to a rise in dollar value for the companies. Dollar drops by 1.5%, indexes rise by 1.5% to keep valuations steady.   I'm no analyst, but that's what makes sense to me.
At least he noticed and didn't instead use the oh-he-didn't-answer-my-prayer-because-he-works-in-mysterious-ways-and-has-something-else-in-mind bullshit rationalization. 
pee pressure
Clearly they're not.  If cyclists were supposed to follow normal traffic laws, then why do none of them stop at red lights?  Are you implying they're all lawbreaking scofflaws?  What do you have against cyclists?
Cold temperature, too, increases bloodflow.  "Holy shit, it's freezing out here.  My cock is practically bursting the seams on my pants!"
Carbon is not to be faulted because of what people do for it. Diamonds are just a beautiful stone; clear stones are the same as a white dress- a symbol of purity. Of course, I know the history of De Beer's marketing, but it fits on this occasion. Also, having such a hardness to them is good for an every-day ring, like a wedding/engagement ring should be. Softer stones would chip or scratch. That being said, if you want to forgo having a ring at all, that's fine too. It's certainly not a stupid tradition, tho.
What? Are you like Ron's brother?
Year:  3579269156 7112354490 4010605143 1979159431 4295064561 8589392142 1159721295 3543946967  0086451039 0559934539 8856437659 5875372309 1525576202 2494916804 4352297616 5452072027  8438583780 5482485050 6048597424 2563853874 1927298060 6122786584 0508431148 1356041812  5617286007 5871037052 8891809818 5338767551 4323024412 7799454587 6231442066 1274551731  1642408791 8409947979 5623588273 7998798479 1297031617 7682636995 3205761285 6766505935  4957267798 6197331497 3595753479 22781
Does anybody know where the original art came from or who did it?
No self respecting person would become a US police officer, because they'd be forced to participate in our ridiculous drug war.
In the 50s and 60s they used to teach that one should bicycle into traffic. Now the laws in most states actually classify bicycles as traffic and require you cycle with the traffic.
Tasmania
I love how your comment gets down voted because it makes people think that maybe their wrong.  So instead of addressing just downvote it...out of sight out of mind.
Hobart
is it weird for me to like a girl whose tits are completely nipples? nippletastic.
he might just have gotten off on cuckolding, or being a voyeur. but yeah, odd combination of attitudes.
Fantasy Football Playoff Games!
Guys:  5791379150 4429527589 7266499940 5679173432 1259999652 9192852420 3782053452 6453881674  8599360150 2373544249 3644977630 4858694130 0339649093 1068607677 4967096632 9370525710  6162885690 1439736108 1940758167 8232460344 2141733681 9269257040 7879206641 4977673632  5569977395 5252467538 5133447074 4608178810 3542506754 7183936779 4840167246 2026880624  7944131849 9366291729 8807248887 1425703666 3575182779 8963313065 6033974734 8144068548  4664802004 1039680568 6585570388 48216
I named mine Testiculous... then he was passed by a cock-eyed squid.  _Seriously_.
not surprised that the suspect is an african-american male. 
Make sure your Linked In profile doesn't have typos in your personal site URL.
Bullshit - the police could not say where he came from.
he is right, that is how much this administration screwed up the educational system.
510 seconds
Meet the new boss Same as the old boss
because the offending team *never* calls themselves the terrorists, even if they commit the same crimes.
depends where he worked. 
So you can watch the shock waves roll back and forth across their bodies?
&gt;...you define "scientific" in a manner that fits the conclusions you want to draw.  Are you serious? *Your definition of science allows for scholasticism*. How can you say this without personal embarrassment?  &gt;The argument was regarding the labor theory of value, not how to define "science."  The paper I linked is an explicit argument that the LTV is scientific - a conclusion which the empirical evidence that the authors gather supports.  By contrast, you may as well be telling me how many angels can fit on the head of a pin.
The federal government spends most of its money on the military, social security, and medical programs. The military wouldn't work as well on a state by state level. I also don't see any great benefit to be gained by giving states control over social security. As for medical programs, those are administered by the states. I'm not sure we have a problem with too much central planing.  &gt; taxes like income taxes do greatly hurt the working poor.  Again, I disagree with this statement. The working poor pay a smaller percentage of their income to income taxes then a wealthy person. We have a progressive income tax in the US.   However, most sales taxes in the US are regressive. Meaning a working poor person will pay a larger percentage of their income on sales tax then a wealthy person will. (One way around this problem is to exempt necessary items from sales tax, but that is another discussion.)  There are problems with the US tax system. But I don't think our income tax is one of them.  If you really wanted to look at a tax that hurts the poor, look at social security tax. It takes a big chunk of the average persons income, and once you've made over $102,000 this year you don't have to pay any social security tax for the rest of the year. Talk about regressive!
I disagree with the reasons the author give for wanting the change, but I agree that she should go.  A speaker should be effective and positive.  Pelosi (and Reid) have been as negative and obstructionist as possible.  Gingrich was a good speaker because he performed without the combativeness that Pelosi and Reid have demonstrated.  Hastert, although positive and effective, was a disaster as a rubber stamp for the lobbyists interests.  Also, he should be prosecuted for passing a law that increased the value of his property (by funding an interstate highway that runs next to it).  I believe it was his last legislation passed before his retirement.  Unbelievable.  60 Minutes did a long piece on it.
Says McCain08
Not exactly, but I doubt many Zunes will be operating in 2100.
I think you would really enjoy it, they have bootcamp so they can run windows natively. Most of us just use osx and use a 3rd party app like vmware or parallels , which will allow you to run xp at the same time as osx its great.  Osx is so easy to use, after a week you will be a pro. I think you should try it , you wont have to worry about anti virus or spyware, and its really easy.  The refurb models are an excellent deal they come with a warranty at least, also select "education" and make up a school, sometimes it can knock off an extra 100 dollars or so at the apple website
Ahh...ahhhh....ahhh...Chooooo!
I love it when you guys don't agree with somebody you always resort to name calling.
"Frozen quicksand." Now there's a term to inspire nightmares!
&gt; Anyway, we are all incorrect, since no "ask"-tag exists in the xhtml dtd ;)  Augh, you caught me!
Somebody did that to me on a CVS help forum.  It kind of hurt when it was directed at me :(
Ontario.
your gay
You are spot on. If we could find a way to commoditise time, we would remove the fear of automating all our factories. People would not feel they loose by working less.
I wonder why Lemon Sharks don't resemble lemons, or the other way around.
Toronto.
If he is a american.
those nuts should start praying for a way out of their 24.5 trillion in debt.  Good luck!  Jesus loves you!
I don't know where to begin with your nonsense.
Where is the feature to report a post for inaccurate headline. It explicitly does _not_ say the guy was Arab. It said he was a foreigner. 
My parents stopped taking us to church when I was maybe 4 because my sister (who is 14 months younger than I am) started having nightmares about that kind of thing.
Thank You ubikwitous for posting this great article, it's nice to know that there are others who suffer from the same kind of internal dialogue as i do. I just hope for his sake, he is going to therapy.  I started seeing a doctor in Feb. of 2008.  Since then, with the help of medication and talk therapy, I have learned to calm my obsessions with my own death, and many other things.   If anyone else relates to this article, and feels like they need someone to talk to, feel free to message me.  (I may not be online until after Jan 5)
it'd be intimidating though. 
Yes, and it makes me want to Slap Chop his face.
I think what you are really asking is "Can I hypnotize my girlfriend and then get all freaky on her?".
Just think of it like a shark cage.
Caps lock on  LITTLE CEASER'S PIZZA IS A GOD DAMN ABOMINATION. THEY USE THE LEAST AMOUNT OF CHEESE POSSIBLE AND HAVE THE SHITTIEST CHAIN PIZZA. 5$(sic) pizza for the god damn loss you cheap fuck.
Well, when I parse that in my head, I read:   'omfg you didn'  oh, a single quote, the single quote block is now terminated. Then later, I encounter another single quote which would start a new single quote block that never actually ends (and prevents the topmost double quote block from ending).  There are several solutions for this problem  of single quotes being ambiguous:  * Stop using single quotes for quotations and only use them as apostrophes.  * Stop using single quotes as apostrophes and find another glyph to represent them. (Or stop using contractions and possessives altogether)  * Escape the single quotes.  "I was talking to this guy, right; He was like, 'omfg you didn\'t put me in single quotes, did you?'"  That makes perfect sense to me.
amen
You are going to have idiots all over the world packing butter now.   Stop teasing the idiots.
It's seriously tempting, but I hate to travel and my kids would lose out on time with their grandparents if we were out of country, as neither set will leave the country.  I have a feeling my dreams will be put off until the kids are out of the house.
If one looks at the rise in revolutionary thought and the birth of what we today call nihilism in 1860s Russia as analogous to the US's 1960s, a revolution (or other social collapse) seems likely about that point.  I really doubt the US will break up that soon.  I hope like hell, but doubt it.
Saved, can't wait to read it later, sounds like pure gold...but now off to News Years revelry!  Happy Neeeeeeeeew Year everyone!
As an added bonus, my husband would probably get really excited.
If software is your interest, Apple can't be beat. Your logic doesn't make much sense either considering you purchased a Mac. I don't understand how you can make any serious argument about Apple's monopoly on hardware vs. MS monopoly on software.
no doubt you are right but hey I have an interesting idea! The US has a lot of debt right? how about not giving money to a country to arm itself and then giving aid to the country which gets devastated by those arms. How about we pay off OUR DEBT WITH THAT FUCKING MONEY
Rage movie:  *id logo*  Yeeh id! I remember those guys! They made Quake and Doom and...  *EA logo*  **OH GODDAMMIT**.
One can maintain their own property rights depending on how strongly people are trying to take away those rights. If no one tries to take your property rights than nothing is required of you. If there are a few bad apples you can put of a fence on your property. If they are more aggressive you put up a barbed wire fence and maybe get some dogs. If it's just you and almost everyone is a communist you have all of that put out landmines armed guards electric bears automatic torrents and anything else you can think of. You don't need a government for any of that.   Besides the state does not protect property rights, it's just an instrument of retribution after the fact. If the state was protecting property rights wouldn't the area the cops are in 90% of the time(downtown) be the safest place to have a business or go walking around at night rather than the most dangerous?
Bro! Awesome comment...saved!
Hat off. Have an orange.  
seeing as noone has posted in 3 hours, Im pretty sure that I win.
Well said, Cynthia.  I am with you in spirit and you make me proud.
FLAWLESS VICTORY
fyi my letter Subject: Case ID xxx - Notice of Claimed Infringement &gt;  &gt; RE:  Unauthorized Distribution of the Copyrighted Motion Picture  &gt; Entitled &gt;   xxxxxxx &gt;  &gt;  &gt; Dear xxxxxxx: &gt;  &gt; We are writing this letter on behalf of Warner Bros. Entertainment Inc. &gt; ("Warner Bros."). &gt;  &gt; We have received information that an individual has utilized the  &gt; below-referenced IP address at the noted date and time to offer  &gt; downloads of copyrighted motion picture(s) through a "peer-to-peer" &gt; service, including such title(s) as: &gt;  &gt;   xxx &gt;  &gt; The distribution of unauthorized copies of copyrighted motion pictures  &gt; constitutes copyright infringement under the Copyright Act, Title 17  &gt; United States Code Section 106(3).  This conduct may also violate the  &gt; laws of other countries, international law, and/or treaty obligations. &gt;  &gt; Since you own this IP address (xxx.xxx.xxx.xxx), we request that you  &gt; immediately do the following: &gt;  &gt; 1) Disable access to the individual who has engaged in the conduct  &gt; described above; and &gt; 2) Take appropriate action against the account holder under your Abuse  &gt; Policy/Terms of Service Agreement. &gt;  &gt; On behalf of Warner Bros., owner of the exclusive rights to the  &gt; copyrighted material at issue in this notice, we hereby state, that we  &gt; have a good faith belief that use of the material in the manner  &gt; complained of is not authorized by Warner Bros., its respective  &gt; agents, or the law. &gt;  &gt; Also, we hereby state, under penalty of perjury, under the laws of the  &gt; State of California and under the laws of the United States, that the  &gt; information in this notification is accurate and that we are  &gt; authorized to act on behalf of the owner of the exclusive rights being  &gt; infringed as set forth in this notification. &gt;  &gt; Please direct any end user queries the following.=20 &gt;  &gt; Marc Brandon &gt; Vice-President, Anti-Piracy Internet Operations Warner Bros.  &gt; Entertainment Inc. &gt; 4000 Warner Blvd. &gt; Burbank, CA  91522 &gt; 818.954.6274 - phone &gt; 818.954.7898 - fax &gt; infringements@warnerbros.com - email &gt;  &gt; Kindly include the Case ID xxxxx also noted above, in the subject  &gt; line of all future correspondence regarding this matter. &gt;  &gt; We appreciate your assistance and thank you for your cooperation in  &gt; this matter. Your prompt response is requested. &gt;  &gt; Respectfully, &gt;  &gt; Marianne Henderson &gt; Enforcement Coordinator &gt; SafeNet, Inc. &gt;  &gt; 
Supply/Demand: there's LOTS of people who are very interested in how to get out of jury duty, whether you think they should do it or not...  Besides, "...a blog about how someone did their civic duty and served jury duty." that's fucking boring, no one wants to read that shit...would you like to read a blog post about how I went down to the mall today and DIDN'T shoplift anything, just paid for it normally like everyone else and went on my way?? See what I mean?
Phil Lesh and Bob Weir at the Bill Graham Civic Auditorium.  Deadheads = A mellow crowd on a not so mellow night
Oh that's a non biased source if I ever saw one.
ode to petroleum
No, I don't remember her. Please do tell me what the story is behind the "best cosplay ever" girl.
Again, what you quoted was a very incident where Israel attacked before being attacked.  Just as Israel isn't going anywhere, neither is Hamas.  The reality is that both sides are going to have to live with the existence of the other.
OOOOOOoooooo. Snap.
I caught the end bit of this today. While fascinating, it was total garbage.   Just after that was Apocalypse How, a show about, well, does it need explaining?
Crikey!
soon to be ex cat
Good point, I was thinking French Riviera, but it could just California's Pirate's Cove (or Perv Beach). Dam it.
Not sure why I upmodded you.
Wait, it's 2009 there? What's the future like? Do they have flying cars?
I am sure if you drink enough there will be plenty of heaving.
He must be thinking Israel "created" Hamas and its executives are Mossad agents. In before rimshot.
&gt;auxiv  &gt;whats happening now in our society is this: [secularization](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Secularization) I havent been to church in years myself. My concern is for the kids, and society as a whole. Society is straying further from basic principals. I believe single parents, kids having kids, and homosexuality are leading factors in the degradation of our society. I was born in the early 70's. I grew up in a time when kids didnt bring guns to school and shoot everyone, and all the other nonsense that is going on with our younger generation these days. all these are contributing factors in the decline and degradation of society as a whole. To allow "out of the norm" breeds more "out of the norm". You call it progress, I call it a bunch of people who cant accept rules that were handed down from generations past. The further we stray from these basic "rules" and ideologies, the further society will stray from basic moral principals. People are trying to raise their kids in this mess. They see marriage of gays as another milestone further away from a healthy society, in which their kids must grow up and live. Ps. You should tell your wife you're gay.  In regards to your childish PS note telling me to tell my wife that I'm gay, I need to ask you this: standing up for the freedoms and equality of everyone makes me gay?  I personally feel that people of all ages, backgrounds, skin tones, sexes, and sexual orientations should have equal rights and treatment, and that somehow makes me gay?  Your statements are only proving you're a close-minded bigot.  Different sexual orientations are nothing new, as homosexuality was around even before the days of Greece.  It's obviously a part of humanity, and just because you disagree with that fact does not make you right above everyone else.  And you're concern is for the children?  You're still a close-minded bigot.  There has never been any evidence suggesting that the degradation of our society is directly linked to homosexuality, single-parent families, etc.  Let's just say that there are case studies that state otherwise.  We can easily argue right back against it.  Was there mass chaos in our society back in WWII, when mothers were forced to raise their children alone because their husband's had died in the war?  Nope, just the same routine problems society faces.  Homosexuality was a closed topic back in the early part of the 20th century, but it was slowly emerging.  Just because it wasn't a frequently as discussed topic today as it was back then, doesn't undermine the fact that there were homosexuals.  So according to your pathetic, childish argument, the frequency of people admitting they're gay is contributing to the downfall of our country?  By that logic, children admitting that they want to be astronauts or firemen would contribute to the fixing of our nation's problems.  And that's why you're clearly wrong.  People admitting who they are isn't doing the damage, as there is no substantial connection.  Instead, maybe we should actually blame the *real* problems?  For example, we have corrupt politicians taking bribes to alter laws.  Our laws, every year, keep compounding on top of one another, making the law difficult and confusing.  That's why our forefathers had the simple style of government: so that things would run and be handled more easily and efficiently.  Also, let's not forget the pressures our schools and system put on our youth, or the fact that our schools only function as well as the amount of funding they get [i.e., poor neighborhoods receive little].  You need to stop blaming homosexuality as some sort of "megasource" of problems and face up to the fact that there are other factors at play.  And where in our Constitution does it state we're supposed to stick to these "basic rules" and "idealogies" you seem to make mention of?  You're definitely wrong, as the Treaty Of Tripoli, specifically Article 11, states that there is a separation of church and state in our government.  So you're wrong, there was no religious foundation from our nation that we're straying away from.  And even more importantly, is that religion does not equate to level of morality.  Child molestation has been documented from the Catholic Church in this nation for well over 100 years.  And that's just one example...  You have no evidence supporting your argument, and there's plenty of evidence and strong argument against it.  Stop criticizing the things you have a prejudice for, and maybe focus more on the *ACTUAL* problems contributing the downfall of our civilizations.  Not everything in the world is the way you perceive it.
To hell with her husband.  He's probably not even related to her anyway.
I suggest you do what your parents did! Get a job, sir!
&gt;If you know the name of a politician or presidential candidate, odds are better than good he or she earned their national notoriety and campaign viability by signing on to the program as it stands today. That's not a good recipe for cooking up an agent for change.  This is what gets people. They don't want to work for change, they want some messiah figure like Obama to deliver it to their doorstep with free shipping. Thus, it never comes because the figures who are promising change only got their air-time because the Establishment selected them. The only significant change that's happened in the last 50 years was the Civil Rights Movement and it was earned with the blood and sweat of the people who wanted it.
&gt;, but also could undermine any action Bush may take.  Bush is going to take action?
there's only one real reason- the rays.  sorry yanks or sox- whichever one gets left out, i could really care less.
boo!
&gt; Dude, they don't have nachos. Mystery solved.
I haven't the slightest who this 'mazen kerbaj" fellow or lady is, but I love their art.
so you can't boil the weed, like in a stew.  It has to get to 392?
. . . or just has a firewall rule set to drop all ICMP echo request packets.
FTA: "It's simple enough for the music theory-inclined: vi-IV-I-V. No good? Well, for a song in the key of A minor, it would be Am-F-C-G."  The progression Am-F-C-G is actually vi-IV-I-V in the key of C major. This these are chords diatonic to C major: CEG (I)  DFA (ii)  EGB (iii)  FAC (IV)  GBD (V)  ACE (vi)  BDF (vii diminished)
... Do it anyway?
I'd have hit her.
great analogy...points for creativity
These white liberals will get what's coming to them when they have no other place to move.  I hope it is harsh, they deserve it.
He's not yet your president!   Bush still is. He did not comment either and neither did Rice, though her role was significant earlier.
ah, no. this sounds like well thought out research that sought to clarify the relationship, if any, between homophobic attitudes and sexual response. They didn't seek to, or claim to prove anything.  and what's the 'party line' here?
Does when make it ok? These are the animals you defend.  But not to worry - the cockroaches are planning to start again.  Iran is signing folks up as we speak. They dont respect their OWN lives - certainly not anyone else's.  http://www.allvoices.com/contributed-news/2134039-volunteer-suicide-bombers-seek-to-attack-israel  http://www.usnews.com/articles/opinion/2008/12/19/palestinians-training-kids-to-be-suicide-bombers.html  http://www.cbsnews.com/stories/2008/12/31/world/main4693681.shtml
I think you mean sleep child molesting.
The problem then is that *real* victims of crimes won't report.  If you really thought some fucker would kill you for turning him in and damn the consequences, would you turn him in--even if he were a great danger to society--if it meant you'd have to face him?
You're confusing the Hubble imagery with our eyes. The Hubble shoots black and white -- that is absolutely true.   The images we see from the Hubble are generally artistically recolored.  However the universe is a colorful place and we can see those colors with a normal camera and our eyes.
Happy new year 'cause it means my zune will work again.  Yippy!
My Christmas didn't go as planned, so I'm going to give [this](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/7ljcf/askreddit_whats_your_holiday_tradition/45pg) another shot...
When I was 14, I would have been happy if she just let me use her vagina.
This saddens me.
What's the exploit?  All the whiners crying about the wall jumping?
Eat your lawn.
I think one of the key points to address that is this: Ultimately, after cuffing him and hauling him into the cruiser, the police didn't see fit to actually *charge* him with impersonating an officer.  Were there a real concern that he was actually doing so I think he would be charged. That he wasn't leads me to believe they were playing power games.
First: return it. You don't have to deal with that shit; replace it with something that doesn't try to lock you into legacy tech. (Sorry, I can't really give any recommendations, but I imagine you can find them with a bit of googling.) Second: If you can't (or don't want to for some reason) return it, you could try user-agent spoofing. I'm afraid I don't recall how to do this with FF, but I'm pretty sure it doesn't require an extension. Google "Firefox User Agent".
This stuff will make you a GODDAMN SEXUAL TYRANNOSAURUS...  ...Just like me.
The voices were perfect
Well, on some level a lot of international politics can be summed up by paranoia. I'm thinking specifically about Russia and Chechnya here, where they take a hard line because they fear losing their grip on other areas. Or at least, that's what I've read, I'm really an amateur at all this, and my thoughts are especially disorganized today.
I upmodded your topmost comment and respect your comments in general, but this one - honestly, advising people to build their own logging frameworks???   Please no!  It's nothing do with how trivial it is to implement - it's about who else needs to use that logging.  Use a standard framework (log4j, syslog, windows event log, ...) so people other than you can grok, control and integrate with your logs.  Otherwise you're just being a pain in the butt to everyone except yourself.
3000 rockets launched into a neighboring country over 7 years?  That's more than 1 per day, for the entire 7 year span, and is (much) more than enough to be considered an act of war by any nation on this planet.  To be clear, again, Israel is not innocent either... but "Nerf darts"?  Really?!  And let's not forget about suicide bombings at shopping centers and coffee houses.  I don't think there's anything "Nerf" about them.
yeah but then they have clauses in the government policies regarding EULAs that allow them to ignore the clauses that you are referring to when convenient (i.e. when nukes are involved)
Fat whale men on the beach aren't aesthetically pleasing either, but I'm forced to count his boob rolls on my hand.
Right, the same way people don't remember Andersonville (heh, firefox definitely doesn't!) or the Bastille or the Star Chamber..
not more powerful, just proving to be significantly easier to develop for, and to juice power out of. The PS3 is such a complex piece of hardware almost no one has figured how to use it at full capacity yet.   I'm not saying that's a good thing, btw, but it's the truth. The PS3 is and will always be the more powerful console. And yet nearly every cross platform game that has come out has looked better on the 360. 
I might have to start 'sleepwalking' 
CAPS LOCK!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
YES
&gt; Nonetheless, I am still quite satisfied with the purchase (yet keep my eyes open for something better).  "I use an old Mac Mini and Plex"  I would highly recommend giving Plex a try, its surprisingly good after initial setup. http://elan.plexapp.com/
It is true that Jews liked it but it was never used. The Jews liked it because they had been able to influence it so that even thought they were only 30% of the population at the time they were supposed to get something like 55% of the land. So it obvious why the Palestinians didn't like it: It was simple not fair.  Not all Jews liked. A Jewish terrorist group assassinated the UN negotiator.
Why not?  If your parent offered you your first joint, would you take it?  I would have if I had the opportunity.  And the fact that one of the children was only 14 leads me to believe that it was their first.
Usually weird in a good way.  This is clearly weird in a BAD way.  Yikes!!!  I need brain bleach.
[comment] This is a comment
Imagine if Kevin Rose bought Reddit, then merged both into Diggit or something. The horror would be astounding. Speaking of him, [here](http://i42.tinypic.com/1rurrq.jpg)'s his response to the "uprising."
Sony Betamax VCR?
I want a woman that doesn't exist.
Give israel 30 billion to kill palestenians and give palestenians 85 million to bury their dead.  Nice.
No one else is wondering how he survived that fall??
Metal ass-shit? Ow.
I guess lots of other people want to know the same thing!
Agreed.
restart later (i clicked that button five times yesterday)
Just in time for new years eve. heh
It can get boring, I warn you.  Recycled news, and all that.  But it's nice when I don't have a chance to check reddit, my husband keeps me updated.  Well, updated on his subreddits, anyway.
Yo dawg, I accidentally one hundred pushups, see what I did there? FUCK IT, WE'LL DO IT LIVE WHILE WE DO IT LIVE so you can whistle for a cab, and when it comes neALL GLORY TO THE HYPNOTOAD. I give you a hamburger. I GIVE YOU A HAMBURGER.
I didn't steal no credit card!
"You unlock this door with the key of imagination. Beyond it, is another dimension. A dimension of sound. A dimension of sight. A dimension of mind.  You're moving into a land of both shadow and substance, of things and ideas. You've just crossed over, into the Twilight" Zune.  http://videos.matchdoctor.com/1134/The_Twilight_Zone_Intro.html
No, they're saying the Holocaust card isn't a free license to do anything you want.  And you're getting dangerously close to pulling a Godwin, my friend...
As I was reading this 'Beat It' randomly played on the TV. 
Your wish is granted ...
Why does anything in this life or any future life or any past life matter?
touche.  *puts away e-penis*
I'd like to say I'm a "power user." Okay, I'm not.
So for Redditors...just continue being the same.
It says on Wikipedia that Mika Brzezinski is a co-host of the show and that she's Zbigniew's daughter.  Is that true?
The only one worth a damn (In my humble but informed opinion) is a polarizing filter, for a reason you didn't mention - they eliminate reflections and glare. If you're shooting anything shiny, a polarizing filter is necessary.  A word of warning though to be very careful if using one with a zoom lens. With many of the low end ones, the front end (where the filter is) will twist as you zoom in and out. As polarizing filters are dependent on orientation, it will need to be continually readjusted. If all you're doing is shooting landscapes and want a bright blue sky though, skip the polarizing filter and do it in Photoshop.  In general I say stay away from filters - with the exception of the reflection killing feature noted above, the effects can be duplicated in Photoshop and filters in general can lower the image quality.  The only other one that's conceivably useful is a ND filter, but that's only for the very special case of getting long exposures in broad daylight. 
Or you could just escape your parens.  [stuff]\(http://example.com)
I want a job. Santa didn't deliver.
This is the most literal representation of "curiosity killed the cat" I have ever seen.
&gt;Is criticism of the US considered anti-Christian?  Apples and oranges.  Israel is a secular state.   The US is explicitly religious in nature.  Americans pledge their allegiance to their god each morning.  Israelis do not.
Yes yes it is. One nation under false gods.
I do think this is a good metaphor... mostly because, yes, both sides act quite a bit like children.
If you're really *that* strapped for time, you should try loosening your schedule a bit.
I only *wish* they'd do that to mine?  Ball hair?  _I could take that company for millions_  And they'd leave the genetic evidence _right in the box_! God damn :|
Seriously, is that the best they could do in Photoshop with that megaphone??
I find it quicker to right click when copying and pasting, but, what can I say, I'm over fifty.  Whatever. It beats typing (or drawing) on paper, then cutting it out with scissors and pasting it onto a different paper, along with photos cut to size, which is how we prepared the college newspaper back in my day. (I'm exaggerating about typing on paper, actually we typed it on paper, then one of the students typed it into MS DOS for typesetting, which was considered too newfangled and hi-tech for all the students to have access to.)
"engorgement" - I lol'd
Both of you were right. Clouds move and so does the Earth.
#1: A shooting star passes across the sky is much less time than it takes for the visible motion of the stars on a video shot of this size, yet the stars are moving during the period that a shooting star crosses the frame.  #2: These are composites of STILL images taken every 30 seconds to 1 minute, so at the most you'd just see a single streak flash into and out of existence in the time it takes to display one single frame of the video (1/30th of a second maybe).  #3: Actually I just realized that they *could* be satellites, which move slowly enough to show up in this manner.  Maybe that's it.
Hanging with a small group of friends and lighting off fireworks.
a winner is you!  http://free-game-downloads.mosw.com/abandonware/pc/arcade_action/games_f/freddy_s_rescue_roundup.html
&gt;if you have a distributed build environment   come on, how many people have that (set-up)?
And a liter of cola.
Simple, eloquent and wrong.
I actually rather enjoy my Zune, tbh.  I've had Ipod's before (1st and 2nd gen.), but I really like the way the Zune handles content, esp. video.  I'll probably not buy another one though.  Once this 30gb one I have wears out, or I get tired of it, I think I might give that Ipod touch a try.
Yikes -- didn't mean to offend. Reddit, to me, is half jokes and half useful information. It's how we stay (somewhat) sane. Just because I replied doesn't mean someone else can't reply with an actual answer to your question.
That too :)
Whatever happened to the PSP? The device that Sony once touted as "the Walkman for the 21st century" is fast disappearing from popular consciousness, and if you believe the rumors circulating just three-and-a-half years after its launch, it's up for a major rethink in 2009.
Blogspam jewhate!  Yaaay reddit!
9/13/2001  *"We should invade their countries, kill their leaders and convert them to Christianity."*
So....did you have to go to the emergency room when you fell off the truck? It's still funny as hell though.
For Zune users, December 31, 2008 will be known as The Day The Music Died.
i'm just lazy.
Sexually, perhaps?
&gt; Some tools provide -0 option to end file name with zero byte to workaround space-in-file-name issue.   find . -type f -name '*.txt' -print0 | xargs -0 -i mv {} ~/Documents/.  is the pedagogical example, of what you're talking about. It works this way because xargs splits on whitespace by default.  However, xargs most certainly supports names with spaces - you can use `-d` to specify any delimiter you like, it's only that using spaces by default is convenient.  See, most unix tools don't parse their arguments, but rely on the shell to do it for them. xargs is a rare exception, but it still supports filenames with spaces.  So no, I expressly reject this as evidence that "many unix tools can't even handle spaces in filenames properly" as it's clear xargs *can* handle spaces, but by default, for conveniences' sake, it does not.  An example of a unix tool that could not handle spaces in filenames would be something that parses its argument directly, or that reads the files its interested in from a configuration file- and most unix tools have terse inputs, and no configuration files, so I think I'm safe in expecting a tool to be rare.  By the way, most of these cases are usually unnecessary:   find . -type f -name '*.txt' -exec mv {} ~/Documents/. \;   &gt; Kernel cannot handle #! line if there is a space in the program name.   That's a strange corner case, but I'll accept it. Are you proposing optimizing for this case? Do you think it satisfies statictype's statement of "many unix tools"?
Well, all I'm saying is that I want to look back and say that I did I the best I could while I was stuck in this place. Had as much fun as I could while I was stuck in this place. Played as hard as I could while I was stuck in this place... Dogged as many girls as I could while I was stuck in this place.
Firstly, you are an asshole.  Secondly, I'm not arguing that a hospital without government funding would require a payment scheme in order to continue to provide a service.  I was criticising your callous judgement that the family *did not want* to pay. You insinuated that they *could* have paid but decided to let the child die instead.  I think a measure of a government should be the ability to provide for it's citizens. Clearly the chinese government fails in every regard. 
It was a simple comment, a simple mistake.  But for some reason [this comment thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/7c9xx/vote_up_if_youre_damned_well_going_to_stick_qtips/c069prz) made me giggle for hours. There are a million more, many of them epic, many more upvoted.  But there was something about *that one* that made me laugh.  
Wow. Could you imagine the rush if that shit worked?
hahaha you are a retarded nigger...   *not racist  did I do this right, you stupid nigger? 
Have a bunch of really nice friendly girls around who are also on x and don't mind you giving them 3 hour back massages (they won't if they are also on x)
"Kids don't have a problem with nakedness, it's adults." -exactly.
"There is no honor in being dead"  Worf @ DS9.
Automatic upvote for honesty.
I'm not going to read the article. I don't want to risk spoiling my instant belief in the headline.
Oooh. Now I'm getting a sobriety.
Who can cipher anything with zeros fucking a man cia. 
In a World that is constantly evolving to a “green consciousness,” and the preservation of our national resources, a company called CardWerkz is endeavoring to do its small part. It is estimated that over 2 million businesses are started each year, and the one constant that is included in every startup business guide is the need for business cards. Business cards have long since been the long standing staple of conducting a successful business, but the majority of these cards are either lost or discarded. One solution offered by CardWerkz is instead of business cards, how about business texting. It is estimated that 98% of all Americans above the age of 18 own a cell phone. And, wouldn’t it be nice if a business person could have a conversation that went like this, “Instead of me giving you my business card, how about I give you my business text card number and you can have my business contact information instantly texted to you.” With the “Go Green” concept being a major part of the everyday business scene the fact that a company is offering a way for businesses to cut their business cost, and not trees makes CardWerkz a company to investigate when an entrepreneur is thinking about starting a new business venture. For more information on the services offered by this company, visit their website at: http://cardwerkz.com 
Interesting.. I have noticed that some people at work NEVER drink tap water, only Coke and energy drinks.
http://www.reddit.com/r/Marijuana/comments/7lxjr/fox_news_covers_ghangegov_marijuana_questions/56ij
I have only heard of such low prices in India, but they were never described as chicken nugget, just golden nugget and the (edit, lost this) 'mac' is just a name for a double cheese with thousand island. It was only a takeaway not 'real' mcd's
When was it ever said that this is KOTOR 3?  It's an MMO in the KOTOR universe, not some sequel.  It takes place 300 years after KOTOR 2 so there is plenty of room for a KOTOR 3.  I generally don't like MMOs but this is being made by Bioware and they've said that the story will play a major role in the game.  KOTOR and Mass Effect are probably the best RPGs I've ever played, if anyone can make a compelling MMO it would be Bioware.
Well from that argument you could say that it's the people in the crowd's fault for not being honest and illuminating the perpetrator. 
you are hilarious.
Good point.  Also . . .  Maybe it's a reference to Baton Rouge, CA -- or Pont-Rouge, Canada.  Maybe it's a reference to the Rouge Restoclub Website, whose URL is rouge.ca.  Interestingly, ca. is an abbreviation for "circa", but I'm not sure how that works with "rouge" the way halcy used it.
Oh now it's 7000 years? And um, jews sponsored Hamas 20 years before it was created?  Edit: gentlemans, we have a genuine piece of arab propaganda here.
It's offensive to wild animals to compare them to the Palestinians.
Funny, that's what your mom said to me
I bet when you were 14 your girlfriends didn't have vaginas.
&gt; The real way on optimizing complex systems is to look where the CPU+IO wait is being spent. And many times just replacing the IO starved HD with Fusion IO or Intel SSD is enough for long while.  Except this is about _front-end_ performance, which is much less about increasing the speed of your database server and much more about things like file sizes, number of HTTP requests, etc.  All of these weigh heavily on how "fast" an end user perceives your site to be. Or were you planning to do drive-by malware installs to start profiling visitors' web browsers?
happy new year your zune crashed! love, microsoft.
Not modding you down.  But that's discrimination.  Unless you're implying you don't rent to low-income across the board, that I can understand.  That's your choice as the landlord.  That I can agree with.  All I was implying in the original post was that my brothers from anutha mutha are more likely to win discrimination lawsuits than those of other races.  At least around here.  I'm sure there are exceptions.  I'd have to say you're mostly wrong about section 8.  If your apartment manager confirms they are renting to section 8 folks just move the fuck out that day if you can afford it.  Granted, not all people on section 8 are troublemakers.  Some of them are the best damn neighbors you could hope for if you like to drink, smoke, cook out, whatever.  But then someone steals your goddam stereo for the 2nd time and you realize you're not comfortable letting your kid play alone outside any more.  It just fucking happens.  Low income = higher crime 95% of the time...
This is the correct response.
&gt;Capital is readily investable wealth.  Investable wealth which is used to organize those without access to it toward some productive end. I think it is best understood as a relation between men, as it clearly does not reside in the physical goods, but in the social construct of property relations. This is tangential to the points at hand though, so if you like, I will concede.  &gt;Police exist in communist, totalitarian, feudal and monarchic regimes just as well as they exist in capitalism  And in every society in history their explicit purpose has been to enforce the property relations attendant to class distinctions.
I buy local and dont shop at walmart.
I'm a huge fan of Cole Hahn's casual shoes, they look great, are really well made and have Nike Air underneath so they are comfy. Diesel also makes awesome tennis like shoes that are cool with anything.
Yeah, some "solution" they came up with. I think I might find a better "solution", by using another player from another company.
There was a post a while back entitled 'Best Cosplay ever!', and it was of this girl.
Who keeps a MP3 player for 4 years anyway?
she only has one issue. which she is passionate about and I agree with. that doesn't make her a good potential congressman.... and i hate pelosi
Woot?
And just to be safe, throw a little bit of acid on top for a nice candyflip. Watch your little eyes jump around in your head in joy.  It's the only sensible thing to do.
Gezuneheit.
FIFY: You're Engorged.
It also indicates that he's gay (balls are touching).
How look we are better than uganda congo.  israel is so proud to be better than uganda and congo.  Nothing like setting low expectations for yourself huh?
They are *your* own and it is *your* justice system. Not mine. You get what you vote for.  Hopefully things will change for ye soon but unlikely.  - Editited as I had premature ejacaclickymousis..  - Edited again for more of the above.  
Someone said it was a date thing, day 366 because of the leap year.
Who on Reddit actually needs lectures on calc?  I kinda figured everyone here already knew it
No one was kissing you at 00:00:00 I take it.
I, for one, and genuinely shocked he didn't come forth with the threatened 'proof'. 
That's what happened. It's called history but I understand that you don't accept it -- it doesn't fit your racist world view.  It's ironic how you say that you don't spread propaganda, then in the next sentence that's exactly what you're doing.  It's pointless to try to discuss with you because you don't accept the most obvious of truths. It's like trying to convince you that the world is not flat. People know this in Israel. Check out the New Historians if you don't believe me. They decided to expose the propaganda that had until then been the "history" in Israel.
hmm so they become suspicious of you if you go over the download cap? interesting.
Will the bus let you put your cart on the bike rack?
Hahaha, one time when I ordered Swiss Chalet I wrote: I'm in the tub, just walk in... The guy walked in and was like hello?  then i got mad at him for walking in.   good times.
this is xbox360 9 hunter fix.  no news on pc version yet
yes, but I think the frozen block of Vodka would slide right out of the those shot glasses. Frozen or not anything that cold in your throat is likely to spread a thermal shock in your throat, along with cold burns with a chance of death if it froze your spine.  EDIT: I'm no doctor, but I've seen someone about die from eating a pebble of dry ice, because it froze his throat and stomach.
Anyone know what pages Amazon was measuring when they found that -1% sales drop? Shopping cart, general browsing, search?
That's the worst thing you can do!  It is the only UN agency dedicated to keep the refugees being refugees. In any place in the work there is no such thing 3rd-4th  generation refugees. Those "refugees" are kept in concentration camps in Arab countries. They are deliberately deprived of any rights (including the right to own real estate), so they can be later used as political weapon.
in before OM NOM NOM NOM
In Africa, they only get the happy ending, but that's just what they call being raped by a dude with AIDS.
The reason I broke my rule this time was that taken in the wrong spirit what I wrote was an attack, and I'm just too nice to make anyone grumpy for showing me something cool.  But thanks for the support, in the future I'll be indiscriminate. 
Most likely not. The genetic material on hairs is a tiny bit of skin and other things from where is was pulled from. If any one does this right they will cut their ball hairs and save them self the pain of plucking them.
It depends on how you were raised if you ask me. Your parents run their own businesses then it seems less scary to their children who grow up. Probably, just my opinion. Poor people don't dream quite so big. Again I remind you this is all just my opinion. I totally agree the difference between capitalists and working-class people is imaginary. It's a mental barrier that still has a residue effect in real life. Do poor areas like the Bronx have just as many entrepreneurs as those living in California? Are there as many Web 2.0 start ups?
I'm trying to understand American politics, and it's just not working. Help. I've looked at the Wikipedia page &lt;http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Speaker_of_the_United_States_House_of_Representatives&gt;, and this is [part of] what it says:  "The Speaker is second in the United States presidential line of succession, after the Vice President and before the president pro tempore of the U.S. Senate.[1] Unlike the Speaker of the British House of Commons the Speaker of the House does not normally personally preside over debates, instead delegating the duty to other members of Congress of the same political party. Aside from duties relating to heading the House and the majority political party, the Speaker also performs administrative and procedural functions, and remains the Representative of his or her congressional district."  What does this mean?
&gt; It works out great for the politicians in Israel because the have a constant enemy to take attention away from their own bullshit. If you block anyone off from food and supplies long enough they'll get desperate and do something stupid.  That's unfortunately true. We have a row of convicts running the country.
I do.  It is the responsible thing to do. 
&gt; I don't know if the data of this article can be trusted.  So don't trust it, and instead go read the quantitative analyses from places like Yahoo (to whom these types of optimizations mean desperately-needed revenue) to see the studies which back it up.  It's long been known that the amount of time between clicking a link/typing an address and seeing a loaded page has a huge impact on whether people stick around and continue to use a web site.
I would love to try out jury nullification, if only to see the judge and prosecution get impotently furious.  If I ever get called for a non-violent drug charge, I'm sure as hell going to try.
They can't afford houses. If they can afford houses, they may have to wait a year or more for them to be built.   My cousin owns a landscaping business. He is booked solid until the middle of February just cutting away debris that fell THIS YEAR from hurricanes.  Honestly, I don't know what the answer is, but it's not as simple as "Get a fuckin house".
That isn't how the law works. You don't look for a case that states your exact proposition because it doesn't exist yet. You find a bunch of cases with individual holdings and put them together to come up with a new holding (called legal reasoning and synthesis). Hence, the mountain of cases which, put together, make the Massachusetts case. If your version of the law were true, it would not be possible for African Americans to vote because such a rule didn't exist at the founding.
Sure I care. I just want to have a beer while I'm caring.
I think a fully auto SMG counts as an assault rifle in some people's books. For example, those unfamiliar with firearms may see any fully automatic weapon as an assault rifle....besides saying it was a AR makes it that much more sensational!
That's actually talmudic wisdom.
Eye drops in the drink always works wonders
In these markets, you have no choice but to rent to low income people, but if you had the choice between a white low income person vs a black low income person, who would you prefer assuming they both give you the same problems. Now you may call that racist, but every single landlord who wants to not be sued into oblivion knows the answer to that. I'm just making a comment on how it's easy to blame race and file lawsuits vs realizing it's not about race. By falling into the race card trap, you get more racism.
Hamas hasn't killed anybody.  ISrael joins the list of elite countries which use food as a weapon.
Isn't slicing the pizza radially (normally) cutting it into isosceles triangles?
I was... uh... a pinchhitter for a woman's husband just didn't have the junk.  
&gt; I actually rather enjoy my Zune, tbh. I've had Ipod's before (1st and 2nd gen.), but I really like the way the Zune handles content, esp. video.  &gt; I'll probably not buy another one though.  Agreed. Soon you will run out of unused ears.
Ask the crew of the U.S.S. Liberty, why don't you?  I bet they'll tell you what the Israeli Jews are capable of.
I've own a Core 2 Quad PC with Vista and McAfee Security Center. My machine runs fine, isn't slow nor virus ridden.  If your parents have owned the same virus ridden PC for years, perhaps it needs some attention. Perhaps they need a new computer. Or perhaps you are just creating a straw man to knock down.  If you are so computer savvy, why don't you fix it for them instead of telling them what to do?  Or better yet, purchase a new computer for them. You know, pay them back for all the years they carried you financially.
What year is it in Unix time?
Don't be ridiculous. This conflict is older than that, although it doesn't serve your interests to acknowledge that. Just because Israelis won enough battles that they could adequately defend themselves (therefore declaring themselves an independent state), that doesn't mean that any attacks on them are somehow separate and not a part of a larger conflict. The Israeli declaration of independence "was followed by an invasion of the new state by troops from Egypt, Iraq, Lebanon and Syria, starting the 1948 Arab-Israeli War". The conflict wasn't over. It had been ongoing. No Arab nations ever signed any treaty legitimizing their sovereignty like what was done with America. This conflict has always been ongoing, ever since Britain's conquest of Palestine and its subsequent backstabbing of the Palestinian people after the Jewish population explosion. 
The Mayans have a "fix" set for that day, too.
shit! before you know it, you going to code out punch the monkey game and make million!
You know... the kid was retarded.  That much is obvious. No way I feel sorry for him. I hope he learned a lesson from it. But back to you - if you dont like it, you can certainly leave reddit. Personally I find your attitude representative of someone who cares ...just a bit too much.  And thats fine - the world needs people like you too. But someone took a video of this kid, didnt bother to help him, AND posted it on Youtube.  It was meant to make him look like an idiot - and it did a pretty good job.  I think videos like these just promote more stupidity, and I dont condone them, but I call a duck a duck.
lmfao do you really believe monster cable is going to post a c&amp;d letter on REDDIT??? Seeing as I got 26 points I think most people got the joke, yet you fell so hard you deleted your comment. Nice that made my day. 
We have to. For example, printing true Unicode to the console requires a system call (WriteConsoleW). That's because the print statement uses byte-oriented stream IO and that, in turn, depends on the system codepage (which cannot be a Unicode variant). This means that something as simple as printing the result of os.listdir(u'.') will occasionally fail.
The Soviet Union would have collapsed even without their involvement in Afghanistan. They had deep structural economic problems since the 70s.
&gt; I've never had a bad experience with the police, nor have I ever met anyone who has.  I've had two. One was, quite frankly, partially my own fault. I was young and dumb and did something stupid, was honest about it when I shouldn't have been, and a cop decided to make an example of me just to prove that he could. Just to strut some power.  (It was a stupidly minor thing. A minor fender bender with only one car involved -- mine -- and a tree.)  The second it was a rookie cop with an attitude and his first taste of power, someone I kind of knew growing up who wanted to show what a big man he was. Acted like a total cock.  He is now the Chief of Police in that same town, and wouldn't you know it ... he also grew into a good officer. A solid, honest guy who respects the job.  He sure as hell wasn't when he first joined the force, though.
I would say Dave is pretty much spot-on in everything he says.  He should have run for President - at least then we could have a good laugh every once in a while (sort of a [Pat Paulson](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pat_Paulsen) for the 21st Century).
&gt;Renewable makes more sense and wind cost much less than nuclear per kilowatt.  Only if you compare nameplate power capacity, *maybe*, which is meaningless since wind has a third the capacity factor of nuclear.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Capacity_factor#Typical_capacity_factors  E.g.:  $4.03B for new 1.0 gigawatt wind farm:  http://uk.reuters.com/article/behindTheScenes/idUKTRE4BI1V120081219  $5.1B for new 1.65 gigawatt nuclear reactor:  http://www.iht.com/articles/2008/08/17/europe/energy.php  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Flamanville_Nuclear_Power_Plant  But adjust for capacity factor: the reactor will average some 1.4 GWe, whereas the wind farm will average 0.4 GWe at most. So in this comparison, the wind farm is about three times more expensive in construction cost.  As for amortized lifespan costs, see for yourself:  http://www.raeng.org.uk/news/publications/list/default.htm?Text=costs+of+generating+electricity+report+&amp;Publication=&amp;Search=Yes  British Royal Academy of Engineering   &gt;So far no long term storage system has been shown to work safely other than just letting the stuff pile up on site.  See my other comments [\[1\]](http://www.reddit.com/r/energy/comments/7mnuj/beyond_natural_gas_russia_to_build_26_nuclear/7vgw) [\[2\]](http://www.reddit.com/r/energy/comments/7mnuj/beyond_natural_gas_russia_to_build_26_nuclear/7pmr)
omg aids joke omgomg downvote. 
Thanks, I will look into them. Have a happy new year!
Hey, because there has to be a link made from the opposite team, just like with Iraq and Bush &amp; co.
It's our problem-free...
This guy is full of shit. The map he created to illustrate how he predicts the United States will break up shows little to no understanding of regional demographics in America. To even suggest that Mexico will claim Texas and other southern states while China takes the west coast is completely absurd. And why would Canada claim a bunch of very conservative states in the midwest? The more attention this guy gets the more obvious it becomes that he has no idea what he's talking about.  It is much more likely that Russia will experience a civil war than it is that the United States will split into four different groups of states and be annexed by various nations based on some simple geographic relationship.
/drool
Isn't the jury still out on whether Software is a piece of maths or an artistic expression?
In Soviet Russia, happy ending gets you.
*incredible happiness*
On the bright side, it could have been worse. What if, in stead of freezing, the devices actually instead used the wrong date of 00/00/0000.   *my god...*
Getting Zuned?
I accidently the Zune, All of them!
That's for ISO-18291 standard balloons, of course.
&gt;hum  I got it.  If it wasn't deliberate, it was *funny*, to me anyway. Infact, maybe more so.
Were they out of warranty? I've never seen anyone get turned away who was still under warranty.  Speaking of it, one of the things I like about Apple is the ability to buy extended warranty so long as your existing 1-year is still in effect. I bought mine late, and it was a good thing I did (the thing did indeed give up the ghost at the 2-year mark), and I hate upselling warranties while buying computers.
&gt;What is it about Israel that makes everybody think they should render an opinion?  Because they have been doing it for 40 years.  That's a long time.
&gt; [I] rather said [arbitration firms are one of the aspects of states] States provide arbitration, but so what?  They also provide roads, police, and the post office.  Their essential features and not some laundry list of the markets they've destroyed are what matter. &gt; trying to [intimidate] and belittle those around you Try to be an adult and A) orient on arguments, rather than people, and B) don't be surprised when your hostile advances are simply *reciprocated*.
Try again, I updated the link.  They seem to have changed it. You could also try the [bookmarklet](http://www.reddit.com/r/videos/comments/7mjmt/beautiful_animation_made_from_30000_candles_and_a/7gy8) and create the link yourself.
Meth is verifyibly disgusting .  For example  http://www.drugfree.org/Portal/DrugIssue/MethResources/faces/photo_5.html  And really, I don't see the connection with X. Meth is just a terrible ridiculously long lasting stimulant, x is a mild hallucinogen. Anything that made me enjoy X is exactly the same thing that made me hate meth. There is absolutely nothing to recommend meth. A shitty waste of time. 
Oh man I know what you mean. I was so damn cocky a few years ago that I'm embarrassed to think about it, even though most of the people who remember know that I have changed.
Australia has a president in the future? And Ron Paul wanted to be that president?
Well, darn. I would not know. But according to Wikipedia, it is a whooping lot more: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Israel-United_States_military_relations#Military_aid  Dang those foreing aids (AIDS?)
It does matter since nobody died in years of rocket attacks until Israel started the massacre in Gaza. Sure they were a nuisance but it was the only thing they could do. If you gave them tanks and jets they would use them instead.  Just like the attack on Lebanon two years ago, Israel pretends to attack only "terrorists", but we know what happened then and we know what happened now, scores of civilians dead and wounded and basically all infrastructure destroyed.   You need to wake up. You have either no idea of what going on or you applaud it in which case you're a simple racist.
You hate those guys who explain history, don't you?  Especially if the people explaining it are Jewish.
if octopi can easily escape their enclosures why didn't the purple one just crawl out right after the guy started the car
I'm having a party tonight, but I will probably hop on a little L4D at some point to show it to my buddies, and when that point comes, I will try to look you up.
YES!!  At least it wasn't a leaf blower, I hate those things.
&gt;Unfortunately there are very few on reddit.  Absolutely wrong. Did I mention that you are wrong? But as a 21 year old you can't see the trees from the forest can you.  &gt;No. You cannot be impartial unless you walk the line between both sides of an argument.  A Judge is impartial (or should be). Does he/she ever make a decision? I think you will find that they do after examining the evidence. You are tainted with this idea of "militant atheists"  &gt;How does it "give me away"? I don't fall into the two categories who hold sway here. How is that "giving me away"?  The fact that you use polar terms here also flags you as being biased (a.k.a. not impartial). Do you really think there are only two categories of posters?  Besides, I really protest the use of the word "militant" in reference to all of the atheist posters here. Perhaps you might like to moderate your terms. Then I might accept you as impartial.  Until then, I will continue to think you are just an arrogant kid who cannot recognise the fallacies in his/her own argument.  Peace and have a great New Year.
No no no no no.  &gt; Give their people the most basic of human rights? The right for food and clean water? The right for medicine and electricity? The right to live with dignity?  *These* are human rights.  &gt; The right to live in their rightful country?  This is a political statement you kind of accidentally dropped into human rights.  &gt; What agenda could Hamas have?  Their agenda is stated on their charter. Kill jews, make a -stan.  Fathers, brothers, sons, all subverted by religious mythos and all sacrifice their lives for a cause that can not be won and should not even be tried to be won with force.
Barring a Yellowstone Caldera eruption, that is.
The title of this post "Israel has been in violation of..." is not misrepresenting anything IMO.  It is actually 100% factual and correct. The tone I got from your post is your negativity towards international law.
Just more republican fail hands off regulations.
This coming from Columbus in his philosopher era?
The Gulf states are the richest countries in the world. Why are they so willing to pay for weapons against Israel rather than for infrastructure for Gaza? The Palestinians are so poor because it serves the interests of the Arab nations and the Palestinian leadership that they be so poor. You look at the poverty and blame Israel, yet Arafat died a billionaire.
Just added to my post for clarification.  The party line is Gay = good, Homophobia = evil.  I'm a homophobe myself (not like I hate the gay people but I find this practice disgusting). To claim that the homophobes are secretly homosexuals is bullshit.   I've seen quite a lot of "studies" like this one from this famous University. 
Israel does indeed target civilians on purpose.  They are also amongst the few nations on this planet which use food as a weapon.
Because it was last time Oktapodi was posted to reddit?  ;)
Freedom from jews, right?
12/31/08 WAS INSIDE!!!!!1, JOBS KNEW!!!11ONEELEVENTENZERO  NEVARR FORGAT!!! 
Hilarious. Pixar couldn't have done better.
I just arrived in Halifax, Nova Scotia, Canada today. Don't know anyone, so I guess I'll take a stroll along the harbour and watch the fireworks.
I think he rails against Zionist hatred and their murderous practices. Even the wisest Jews do so as well. God Bless'em.
McCartney used this in 'Let It Be'
I have a few: May all have the best year ever, May my wife and my baby be healthy, May George Bush be convicted for crimes against US citizens.  and may I be wrong about how the obamanation will affect us.
cause the last time was 635,000 yrs ago and it goes off about every 600,000 yrs. . .you wanna ask what?? how about why and how?  and when! . .. so . ..a liquor still, chickens (my own addition for eggs), cats, someone else somewhere else mentioned an iphone with a Wikipedia download. . .electricity via bicycle wheel and magnets. . 
Lol.  That did sound a little "queer surfer dude" didn't it?  My bad.
more likely they just want the torture to stop.  america! fuck you! (because the world needs the world police?)
How do you know somehow that hundreds of innocents have been killed?
Office2007 team? Maybe it just you 'cause Office2007 is selling better than Vista and win more praise. just google it if ya don't believe me.
All we need now is a CuntSmellersINC anecdote and we'd have a solid reddit-thread.  *paging CuntSmellersINC, paging CuntSmellersInc*
Thats actually just one word
we've all been there.   wait.... Bob? 
[National Geographic](http://ngm.nationalgeographic.com/2008/11/light-pollution/klinkenborg-text) had a very interesting article on light pollution in last month's issue.  (They actually had a fairly large section on it, but this was the version of it that I found online). It's worth a read. 
I have wanted to do this for a while but never found the time. Chat users are generally really bad at separating bots from real people, so using Markov chains on real chats ought to get people to enter into some really interesting conversations...  I did a (very brief) experiment for fun in 95 or 96 where a friend and I were discussing how primitive a bot we could get away with and still get people holding conversations.  The first experiment just repeated a single line over and over. The longest "conversation" we recorded was at least 15 minutes of some guy getting more and more agitated because he thought the bot was doing it to annoy him. The bot just passively responded to messages to it - it would not initiate anything.  The second just repeated 3-4 messages in sequence, regardless what the other party said and then started over. Most people who messaged it kept "talking" until they had been through a couple of repetitions.  The third attempt used 4 sequences of 3-4 messages. It would pick a sequence at random and then follow the sequence. I think we might have added a handful of "trigger words" that would cause it to reset and pick a specific sequence too. That was enough to get a lot of people to hold long conversations, and then get increasingly agitated when they noticed the bot asked the same questions over and over.  I think users might be somewhat more sophisticated now, but not much... Something somewhat dynamic would likely still fool a lot of people for a long time...
Israel has *every* effect on "palestinians" *because* "palestinians" are way out of their league attacking Israel. Wars are not fought fairly. Get over it.
I've never had a fast food place ask me that.
I thought this information was interesting.  I hadn't seen this before.  There's more information at the top of the page that goes [here](http://www.aclu.org/safefree/torture/torturefoia.html).  It's worth taking a look at.
Here, have some of this harmless hemlock.
It does, clicking *does* wear out the mouse buttons.  And trying to find replacement parts is a real bitch.
Petition our government to take our military toys away from anyone in the conflict and to stop funding BOTH sides of the conflict.
The other white people must be holding out on me. Where's my piece of culture to control?  I feel like a Jew without a bank.
no problem. I might have a play myself!
I love this guy!
Yep, everything works perfectly in France:  [Tricastin Nuclear Power Center](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/International_Nuclear_Event_Scale#Level_1) July 2008; leak of 6000 litres of water containing 75 kg of Uranium into the environment.  French authorities have banned the use of water from the Gaffière and Lauzon for drinking and watering of crops. Swimming, water sports and fishing were also banned.  [Brennilis](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Brennilis_Nuclear_Power_Plant) - In 1985 the reactor was stopped permanently. The price of decommissioning was estimated to be 482 million euros, much greater than initial estimates.  Decommissioning hoped to be complete in 2015.
citation?  Why would they need support on a modified OS?
bring a real gun. adds to the suspense
we do the exact same thing!  So many times, we're looking at the same page at the same time, and both bust out laughing... 
yeah Pandora says what?
And judging by the downmods, it looks like it still is annoying. :]  I have to regulate my comment karma somehow. I can't look like a perfect comment slut.   If I did, I would develop popularity and create expectations from all of Reddit. If I screwed up ONCE at that point, I would never be forgiven, inevitably leading to the creation of a new reddit account.   I can't handle that kind of pressure! So, I have to have my bad, negative point generating comments every now and then to keep things under control, because that's how *I* roll.
wow, what a hilarious bitch
I'm not sure what guns have to do with anything.  And now in sounds like you're talking about the whole scenario.  The highlighted quotes all came from after they decided he was arrested and in cuffs.  That's why I was talking about arrest mode.  Once they've decided you're going to be arrested, there's no point in trying to talk your way out of it or get into a legal debate.  You will be arrested.  How would the following situation go down in Ireland? I'm really interested.  Not trying to argue here.  Someone gets drunk and goes crazy at a pub.  The police get called.  They show up.  He's swinging a pool cue around.  He puts the pool cue down, but won't leave with them.  He's screaming about how he didn't realize that it's a crime to have a few pints.  That the cops are wankers.  Maybe the whole scenario isn't plausible so far.  But if it is...  Do they pass him handcuffs and ask him to put them on and wait it out? Or do they eventually step in and throw him down on the pool table? Say something along the lines of YOU DO NOT CALL THE POLICE WANKERS! with or without the FUCK? Or somewhere in between?  I imagine they're going to have some version of 'arrest mode', although it may not be as aggressive as it is here in the US.
Yes, apparently having your own opinion on reddit is not acceptable. 
dont worry, there is a far larger community on reddit that knows extremist minorities everywhere ensure the whole world remains in a simmering state of war.   i commend you for not responding with equally vicious and counter productive comments yourself.  
&gt; When Eugene was an undergraduate student, he was near the best in his class. Because that's the kind of undergraduate student that goes on to become a PhD student.  Heh.  Achievement in academia (getting a Ph.D.) is not the same as real academic achievement.  Go to grad school for the long haul.  It's all politics... your advisor matter far more than any research you do.  Also, he's ignoring one small fact: the University of Northern Iowa is not exactly a CS powerhouse.  I bet the Ag department is swell, but you're not going to attract the best and the brightest to Iowa, sorry.
&gt; Vista? I'm disappointed in you, Microsoft.
*shifty eyes*  no i'm not!  *fapfapfapfapfapfap*
GO HABS GO!!!!!!!
Looks like condoms for kids...
Deliberately. Martyrs, remember? Those two arab girls the idiots killed when a rocket misfired, they are martyrs too.
pretty amusing isn't it.  Now do you want that in porn? Rule 34, you know...
&lt;_&lt; err...I call everyone guy. You like, like you'd call someone dude...Let's try it again...  Nice job, gal.
&gt;In Soviet Russia, endings happy you.
That guy has hit the nail right on the head. If a christian did what he suggests, no it probably won't convert me. But it will make me respect them. The hard-sell techniques most evangelists use loses them my respect.  What is also worth bearing in mind is that this advice goes both ways. Many religious people often cannot even comprehend how someone can live without god. Many athiests (myself included) cannot comprehend how someone can be anything but athiest. 
I don't think you detected the tone of sarcasm in my comment. 
Wow. This is the first ever instance of a person downmodding themselves on reddit.  The mind boggles.
Actually, you can do that pretty easily.  My scheme's a litt^H^H^H^H incredibly rusty though, so this is going to be more psuedocode than anything (also, assuming values are only on leaves):   (define (max-tree t curr-max accum)   (cond  ((leaf? t) (max curr-max t))    ((and (empty? t) (not (empty? accum))) (max-tree (car accum) curr-max (cdr accum)))    ((empty? accum) curr-max)    ((else) (max-tree (left t) (cons (right t) accum))))  I'm reasonably sure that will work, provided you actually, you know, define all the functions for the tree type and all.
Joe sure seems to have memorized his WH talking points memo.
This only half-counts, since it was a first-year officer who hadn't passed probation yet.
Any professor who criticized israel would be fired.  You can't blame them for keeping silent. They have families to feed.
Johnson.
I know it's not half as funny as it used to be, say, fifteen years back, but, damnit, I'm going to miss this show. Particularly the Chicken Cannon segment. I also like that real people show up on the show to poke fun at themselves. You don't see much of that stateside. Can't understand why the CBC would kill one of its very few success stories.
but everyone knows that israel and the US buy a LOT of oil from the saudis.
They probably just thought it was funny. But I can imagine that you get that thing with phlegm in your pizza a lot.
you can't piss off florida and contain the effect within the borders of that one state.  there is plenty of spillover in retired jews and religious zealots elsewhere in the country.  You have to go back 16 years to find a winner who didn't carry florida.  And then back to 1960 for the time before that.
Off by one error!? FFFFFFFFFFFFFFFFFUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUU-
Luxury! How I laid awake at night and prayed for wires! NO. We had our eyelids seared shut with a flaming cattle prod!
Yup and we should take them right the fuck back too.
Give me freedom or give me death.
&gt; Dude with "Police" on his black tee shirt was impersonating a police officer.  No, he isn't. He's wearing a T-shirt. A perfectly legal T-shirt you can buy in stores.  He'd have been impersonating a police officer if he tried to pass himself off as a police officer through his words and actions, but since the police obviously had no evidence he was doing so -- he ultimately wasn't charged with it -- it's safe to assume he was just a dude wearing a shirt.  Which is legal.  As I pointed out in another post, the NYPD has officially licensed T-shirts, hats and clothing available for purchase at a number of retailers. If simply wearing such a shirt was a crime, as you say it is, why on Earth would the *police department* license such shirts for the public?
Israel kicked ass in the first war, and as far as I know they did that without any assistance from the United States. Anyways would we really like Israel have to go it completely alone?  We know that it may very quickly end up with nukes and I sure as hell don't want that. His last point... politics in school, because teachers won't just pass on their political prejudices, uh huh.
Uhhhh... 
This sounds desperate.
thanks captain obvious
Ya, and don't be accused of having committing one either.
Off The Chain!
That's no moon, it's a space station!
Please stick to the topic at hand. We need to understand the validity of the declaration stat.
Made by kick-ass women.
Now, tell us about your plans for 2009 :P
I guess they have a dark sense of humor.
&gt;You can easily dismiss voodoo and Zeus–And equate “God” with that. Sure. But you would also have to address the deeper meaning of “God.” The God that doesn’t mean Bearded-King-In-The-Sky, but underlying forces, the creator of universe, the non-personal God that isn’t personified and transcends any particular archetypes.  To borrow a trope from [this article](http://bostonreview.net/BR34.1/byrne.php), your argument could also be used to argue for the existence of dragons:  &gt;"You can easily dismiss Smaug and Tatsu–And equate “dragons” with that. Sure. But you would also have to address the deeper meaning of “dragons.” The dragons that don’t mean fire-breathing reptile, but underlying forces, the scourge of humanity, the non-personal dragon that isn’t personified and transcends any particular archetypes."  If God isn't a bearded king in the sky, then what is He? Under your broad definition of God, the laws of physics or extraterrestrials could be considered God. Your argument doesn't prove (or even provide evidence for) the existence of the supernatural. You can try to make the definition of "God" more vague if you want to "prove" God's existence, but by doing so you make the definition practically meaningless. 
Was not surprised to hear that mess.
it's subaru not suburu - 2:39
Yea. Let's blame the 14 year old boy for being shot by an adult soldier.  Jewish morals.
Is Digg the more mature, intelligent thinking-person's site now? If so, gladly.  
Are you like a red shirt ensign in the classic poem "Iliad" by Homer? 
It's all relative.
LOL Motorola.
Are you fucking stupid? Name one religious fundamentalist in the security cabinet. If there's one thing that Israeli politicians do well it's keeping the religious fundamentalists the fuck away from national security.
I don't actually have a Zune, I would be really pissed if I did. You need to wait till a certain time to plug it in and get it going again! Incredible.
DDT. The cool kids are doing it.
Oh diddy?
They did it in AK earlier; the McValue Menu is $1.50 instead of a buck or ninety-nine cents or whatever, and the double cheeseburger went up to $1.60 in the spring.
Hi we're the Dixie Chicks. We said stuff in England that we'd never say in a stadium in Texas and now people are mad at us. We should be able to say what we want without people getting upset and responding with their own speech because freedom of speech is a one-way street. Please continue to buy our albums you stupid hicks.   Thank you for your support. 
Like the racist you are you say all Palestinians are bad people. Really? That's like the people in apartheid South Africa, or the American South when they talked about black people. They didn't see them as human and you don't either. You're a racist.  I deal with the real history of the Israel-Palestinian conflict unlike you who only have seen the Israeli propaganda. You need to realize that in Israel now they have gotten rid of that old propaganda and you should too.   You can't give one single source for what you say that is not Israeli propaganda.  If you don't think Palestinians can be as amazing as Israelis you have just admitted that you're a racist.
Actually, you could arrest someone for no reason at all if you wanted to.
Why does he spend so much time writing these?
I hope the war on Gaza stops so everybody can wish the folks over there a happy new year
No, I do believe that is exactly the same comic that this submission links to.   Maybe YOU'RE in the wrong thread! Maybe YOU'RE the one who is the center of a secret reality TV show, living in a pretend world.   That's right, everyone you've ever known, loved, hated, sexed... all actors; Actors paid to make you believe that you are living your life, when you're actually living a TV show for all of us to enjoy.   But if this leads to you inevitably discovering the edge of the sky dome by travelling far out to sea and hitting a wall of clouds, you didn't gain your initial suspicions from me.   No, you didn't.
30 ft into my bunker and to busy to answer
&gt;But is it ok for a suicide bomber to run onto a bus or a open marketplace and kill innocent jews?  When did that happen?  &gt;Is it ok to launch rockets into civilian areas.   Is it OK to use denial of food as a weapon against a population?
you had HEAT?
Aaaaand‽‽‽ My god. You are the master of suspense!
Aw c'mon, old people rock. I would go to that party.
Give me one good resin why he shouldn't smoke pot.
I enjoyed this. Thank you for sharing. =)
Yeah that download/upload thing is a real killer for me.  Also, when people call purchases investments, it pisses me off. I'm sorry, but that's not what an investment is.
I have slightly less than 12% of my visitors using IE6. Somewhat fewer using Firefox 2. Almost the entire remainder is using IE7, Firefox 3 or a newish webkit browser. I don't see any reason to worry about anything looking stellar outside of IE7+, Firefox 2+ and Opera/Safari/Chrome. Unless you're playing to a really low-tech niche, everyone has JavaScript turned on my default. Just be careful not to pile too much on IE-- its js engine is glacial.
They both move.  Well, I'm glad you're here to tell us these things. Chewie!  Take the professor into the back and plug him into the hyperdrive!
So i guess the fix is to add "else break" after the inner if statement?
I think it's the other way around. Microsoft is disappointed in Vista.
Let's not forget the UN vetoes, so oft-mentioned in these past few days.
Yeah, not *quite*
Do we have any other choice?
Dear God I wish i'd seen that live.  Props to the woman though she seemed to be having a ball.  I'd not have been able to talk from laughing. I got tears coming from my eyes now.  Good show!
I once worked at a well-known fast food "restaurant". And this is why I never, ever buy fast food any more.  You cannot believe some of the shit that goes on, and it's not just to asshole customers. The people handling the food are often on the minimum wage and they don't give a shit about the customers. That said, there were a few nice people and I'm sad to have to leave them behind, but I've got a real job now, thank god!
So far we've got "Next Thursday we kill all the something something land somethings and take their weapons and fish."
"You can kill her with food"  Child services getting involved kind of makes that not true, though. Granted it was a little late, but they would deal with both.  Edit: You can also thank the American "don't tell me how to raise/feed/indoctrinate my child" attitude for this too. So now for the most part, the only thing that can get you sent to jail for is physical abuse, same as an adult.
At times, I've wished I had that habit.
Squidleybastard will kick your squid's ass!  http://squid.tepapa.govt.nz/build-a-squid/interactive
Sheeit, do you know what kind of kinetic energy an automobile at highway speed has?  Now, add the energy from a full tank of gas to that, and there's no way in hell you're gonna catch me trying to operate one of those death traps while sober.
She'll probably end up with a velocity-raptor  Premature ejaculation is funny... at least for another 20-40 years.
Almost like a penal colony.
I like Hazlitt's simple explanation best.  &gt; It is improbable that the wealth created by government spending will fully compensate for the wealth destroyed by the taxes imposed to pay for that spending. It is not a simple question, as so often supposed, of taking something out of the nation’s right-hand pocket to put into its left-hand pocket. The government spenders tell us, for example, that if the national income is $1,500 billion then federal taxes of $360 billion a year would mean that only 24 percent of the national income is being transferred from private purposes to public purposes.[1] This is to talk as if the country were the same sort of unit of pooled resources as a huge corporation, and as if all that were involved were a mere bookkeeping transaction. The government spenders forget that they are taking the money from A in order to pay it to B. Or rather, they know this very well but while they dilate upon all the benefits of the process to B, and all the wonderful things he will have which he would not have had if the money had not been transferred to him, they forget the effects of the transaction on A. B is seen; A is forgotten.  &gt; In our modern world there is never the same percentage of income tax levied on everybody. The great burden of income taxes is imposed on a minor percentage of the nation’s income; and these income taxes have to be supplemented by taxes of other kinds. These taxes inevitably affect the actions and incentives of those from whom they are taken. When a corporation loses a hundred cents of every dollar it loses, and is permitted to keep only fifty-two cents of every dollar it gains, and when it cannot adequately offset its years of losses against its years of gains, its policies are affected. It does not expand its operations, or it expands only those attended with a minimum of risk. People who recognize this situation are deterred from starting new enterprises. Thus old employers do not give more employment, or not as much more as they might have; and others decide not to become employers at all. Improved machinery and better-equipped factories come into existence much more slowly than they otherwise would. The result in the long run is that consumers are prevented from getting better and cheaper products to the extent that they otherwise would, and that real wages are held down, compared with what they might have been.
Who dat Ninja?
That would require loss of the best part of the pizza.
Too late. If they'd done it starting in 1948, it might very well have worked.
"'Nuff said" to me implied a big crash to follow.  I was sorely dissapointed.
it has been like that for years. i had to present ID and get picked up by a resident as far away as 50th street, and that was 1999 or 2000.   when you see the crowd control situation with literally tens of thousands of drunk tourists penned into barricades where they can't even see the ball, it kind of makes sense if for no reason but to keep a few routes open for emergency vehicles.
Surrounded by my loved ones, my laptop, the remote and a comforter.
[Julia Child cooks a diamond](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PJ-mVHoosdI)
No. Palestinian arabs are not going anywhere and I wish them no ill and I can't wait for them to have their own state. Hamas however is going somewhere from where there's no return.  It is not the goal of "palestinians" to eradicate us, but it is the goal of Hamas. 
£80 a year is still alot of cash. It's not like your draining ever increasing amounts of bandwidth from them, to justify the stupid costs.
&gt; Also, he's ignoring one small fact: the University of Northern Iowa is not exactly a CS powerhouse. I bet the Ag department is swell, but you're not going to attract the best and the brightest to Iowa, sorry.  It's not really fair to comment on the quality of any particular school.  Sure, there are likely more good faculty at CMU: but I've learned not to be surprised to find astonishing faculty in the smallest of places.  And being a tenure-track CS professor *anywhere* generally is correlated with being a very sharp student.  Besides, we have other evidence: he's the *chair* of the department and he's teaching scheme.  Those both must count as evidence of likely sharpitude.
ahhhhh my eyes! Quickly pass me the retinal scraper!
I'm confused.  Black women are *shrinking* but putting on pounds?
I know whenever the power goes out at my house I throw away my clothes and hide in a tree until it comes back on....
&gt;(English Major sighs)  You had a job? Yeah right.
Are you the quill used to write the "Iliad"?
I went for ass@ass.com, but that's just me.
This is why liberals should have voted for the Green Party instead of the Democratic Party. The Democratic Party is morally bankrupt. It is a virtual twin of the Republican Party. There is effectively only one political party that controls the US.
Your potential. Our Passion.  
goodness!
Yesterday I calculated that I spent almost 10 days total listening to music on iTunes since my hard drive crashed a few months ago.
L-L-L-Lame Meme, and there is no excuse, as it always has been.
Define 'arabs' land? I mean hasn't the land changed hands every 50 years or so for the last 1000 years?  Have the arabs possessed modern Israel since the dawn of time?  Have the Jewish people never had a kingdom in modern day Israel? The concept of whos' land it is, is much more complex then you let on.
&gt;VB LINQ  &gt; Dim smallerList = (From name In Names Where name.StartsWith("I.")).ToList  That's cheating :)  LINQ covers a subset of what you might use lambdas for.  Granted, it's a pretty big piece...  &gt;VB Lambda  &gt; Dim smallerList = Names.Where(function (n) n.StartsWith("I."))   Again, it's fine if the function is a one-liner.  I really should've given an example that was more.  I like your ideas with casting.  I'm not sure if I like the $ particularly, but I dig what you're saying.  I think we need parens anyway, just not around the cast type itself.    (12 + 13)$Decimal  I'm not sure If I like it postfix like that though.  In your example, it moves the caller away from the called method...I think I like it better flipped around:   handle = IntPtr$(IFoo$someObject.GetHandler())  Side-note: I think you're one of my new favorite redditors, btw.  I like your insights, and the thorough posts that you make.
well poisoning intentionally is something different from spitting in someones food, but both are repulsive and potentially dangerous.
Like, the whole thing is one big nipple?
